Key: BT=Broader term DF=Definition NT=Narrower term RT=Related term SN=Scope note TNR = item number UF = Used For 3-D graphics USE: graphics TNR: 117 3-D imagery USE: graphics TNR: 119 abstracts USE: documents TNR: 120 accessing USGS data and products USE: USGS information services TNR: 122 acid deposition UF: acid precipitation acid rain acid snow BT: atmospheric deposition (chemical 
Wet acid deposition occurs when sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxides react in the atmosphere with water vapor.
Dry deposition occurs when sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxides react, but not with water.
It settles out of the atmosphere as particles or gases.
[
1
DF: Study methods based on the analysis of sound waves in fluid media, such as air and water, and in the solid Earth (includes analysis of compressional waves in solids, e.g., seismic P-waves).
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 130 activity books USE: educational materials TNR: 133 administrative and political boundaries UF: geographic boundaries governmental units political boundaries BT: culture and demographics RT: cadastral and legal land descriptions geography SN: Use for datasets that contain boundary representations for political and administrative units and related information.
TNR: 135 Advanced Very High Resolution Radiometer (AVHRR) USE: AVHRR TNR: 140 aerial photographs US+: aerial photography images TNR: 142 aerial photography UF+: aerial photographs aerial photos air photos orthoimagery orthophotographs BT: photography RT: remote sensing DF: Taking photographs from the air, such as a photograph of a part of the Earth's surface with a camera mounted in an aircraft.
Usually involves taking strips of overlapping prints for mapping purposes.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 143 aerial photos US+: aerial photography images TNR: 12 aeromagnetic maps US+: aeromagnetic surveying maps and atlases TNR: 149
2
aeromagnetic surveying UF: magnetic surveying UF+: aeromagnetic maps BT: remote sensing RT: electromagnetic surveying geography DF: Electromagnetic survey made with an airborne radiometer.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 150 aeroradiometric surveying UF: gamma-ray spectrometric surveying BT: remote sensing RT: geography TNR: 153 age dating (fission-track) USE: fission-track dating TNR: 58 age dating (radiometric) USE: radiometric dating TNR: 155 age dating (tree ring) USE: tree ring analysis TNR: 59 agricultural water use UF: livestock water use BT: offstream water use NT: irrigation water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Water used for soil cultivation, crop production and livestock rearing.
TNR: 157 agriculture and farming UF: farming horticulture BT: topics NT: aquaculture RT: soil chemistry DF: The science, art, and business of cultivating soil, producing crops, and raising livestock.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 161 air photos US+: aerial photography images TNR: 144
3
air pollution US+: atmospheric composition pollution TNR: 31 air temperature UF: temperature (air) BT: atmospheric properties RT: atmospheric sciences TNR: 167 airborne imaging USE: remote sensing TNR: 170 algae BT: NT: organisms calcareous nannoplankton diatoms dinoflagellates RT: algal blooms bacteria phycology protists DF: Group of unrelated simple organisms that contain chlorophyll and live in aquatic ecosystems.
Formerly regarded as plants, algae are now classified as members of the kingdom Protoctista.
The organisms formerly known as bluegreen algae are now classified as bacteria.
[Adapted from Dic. of Biology, 3rd ed., Oxford Univ., 1996] TNR: 171 algal blooms UF: brown tides red tides UF+: harmful algal blooms BT: ecological processes RT: algae hazards phycology population dynamics DF: Rapid increase in populations of algae and other phytoplankton that occur in water bodies.
[Adapted from Dic. of Biology, 3rd ed., Oxford Univ., 1996] TNR: 176 algology USE: phycology TNR: 185 alien species USE: nonindigenous species TNR: 186 alluvial sedimentation
4
USE: TNR:
sedimentation 63
alluvial transport USE: sediment transport TNR: 64 alluvium USE: unconsolidated deposits TNR: 61 altimetry measurement UF+: satellite altimetry BT: geolocation measurement RT: geography DF: The measurement of altitudes with altimeters such as an aneroid barometer for determining height above ground or above mean sea level, based on the fall of atmospheric pressure accompanying an increase in altitude.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 188 amphibians BT: vertebrates RT: herpetology DF: Vertebrates of the class Amphibia; cold-blooded tetrapods that breathe by means of gills in the early stages of life and by means of lungs in the later stages.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 191 analog format USE: non-digital format TNR: 10 anatomy UF: BT: NT: and physiology physiology life sciences endocrinology histology immunology RT: plant and animal testing therapeutic methods DF: Identification and description of the body structures of living things, and the study of the functioning of living organisms and of their constituent tissues or cells.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 194 animal behavior BT: population and community ecology RT: ecology migration (organisms) migratory species DF: Study of animals' actions or reactions in response to external or internal stimuli.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.]
5
TNR:
201
animal distribution USE: biogeography TNR: 204 animal tagging USE: plant and animal tagging TNR: 101 animal testing USE: plant and animal testing TNR: 102 animal tracking UF: tracking BT: field sampling RT: telemetry wildlife biology DF: Following footprints and other evidence in an area to document the presence and movements of an animal and its interactions within the landscape.
TNR: 783 animals BT: organisms NT: invertebrates vertebrates RT: wildlife zoology DF: Multicellular organism of the kingdom Animalia, differing from plants in certain typical characteristics such as capacity for locomotion, nonphotosynthetic metabolism, pronounced response to stimuli, restricted growth, and fixed bodily structure.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 2001] TNR: 206 animated graphics USE: animations TNR: 13 animations UF: animated graphics BT: graphics DF: Moving diagrams or cartoons that are made up of a sequence of images displayed one after the other.
[Computer Desktop Encyclopedia, 2001] TNR: 210 annelids USE: segmented worms TNR: 211 anoxia USE: oxygen content (water)
6
TNR:
213
anthracite resources USE: coal resources TNR: 215 anthropogenic contamination UF: contaminants (anthropogenic) environmental pollutants pollutants BT: pollution NT: mercury contamination pesticide and herbicide contamination RT: biochemistry ecology ecotoxicology natural contaminants DF: Environmental disturbances caused by pollutants released by human activity.
TNR: 217 aquaculture UF: fish farming BT: agriculture and farming RT: commercial fishery resources fishery resources DF: Culturing aquatic organisms for commercial purposes, either in artificial systems, for example tanks or channels, or in natural environments.
[Adapted from Encyc. of Ecology 
7
SN: This term is to be used for the science of 'aquatic biology' and for biological studies in fresh and brackish water.
For marine biological studies, use 'marine biology'.
TNR: 229 aquatic UF+: BT: NT: ecosystems planktonic ecosystems ecosystems benthic ecosystems estuarine ecosystems freshwater ecosystems marine ecosystems RT: aquatic biology coastal ecosystems ecology limnology marine biology DF: Ecological communities living entirely or primarily in or on water.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 230 arachnids UF: spiders BT: arthropods RT: entomology invertebrate zoology DF: Any terrestrial chelicerates belonging to the class Arachnida, (such as spiders, scorpions, mites, and ticks), characterized by the presence of one pair of preoral appendages with two to three joints.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 241 archaea BT: organisms RT: microbiology DF: One of three kingdoms of living organisms, with Bacteria and Eukaryota.
Archaeans include microbic inhabitants of some of the most extreme environments on the planet, such as thermal vents and hypersaline water, and are widely found elsewhere (for example, in the plankton of the open sea and the digestive tracts of animals).
[Adapted from 
8
RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any one of a group of solitary marine, freshwater, and aerial invertebrates belonging to the phylum Arthropoda, characterized chiefly by jointed appendages and segmented bodies.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 243 articles (publications) USE: documents TNR: 251 Ask-A services (USGS) USE: USGS expertise services TNR: 252 asthenosphere BT: mantle (Earth) RT: tectonophysics DF: Layer or shell of the Earth below the lithosphere; part of the upper mantle.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 254 atlases USE: maps and atlases TNR: 256 atmospheric and climatic processes UF: climate weather UF+: weather monitoring weather observations BT: biological and physical processes NT: atmospheric circulation atmospheric deposition (chemical 
[NaturalHazards.org 
TNR: 262
9
atmospheric composition UF+: air pollution BT: atmospheric properties NT: greenhouse gases ozone layer RT: atmospheric sciences DF: Mixture of gases that surrounds the Earth, being held thereto by gravity; consists by volume of 78% nitrogen, 21% oxygen, 0.9% argon, 0.03% carbon dioxide, and minute quantities of helium, krypton, neon, and xenon.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 263 atmospheric deposition (chemical 
[Air Pollution and Water Quality: Atmospheric Deposition Initiative Oceans and Coastal Protection Home Page, EPA 
10
DF: Systematized study of the composition, structure, and behavior of the atmosphere, the mixture of gases that surrounds the Earth, being held thereto by gravity.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 268 atomic absorption analysis BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Techniques that involve the determination and measurement of atomic energy levels (spectrometry) and chemical identification based on how atoms absorb electromagnetic radiation.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 275 audio presentations USE: audiovisual materials TNR: 277 audio tape UF: audiotape BT: non-digital format TNR: 279 audiotape USE: audio tape TNR: 280 audiovisual materials UF: audio presentations motion pictures movies videos BT: object types RT: graphics images TNR: 278 AVHRR UF: UF+: BT: RT: Advanced Very High Resolution Radiometer (AVHRR) AVHRR images infrared imaging geography sea surface temperature DF: Advanced Very High Resolu
[USGS Earth Resources Observation Systems (EROS) Data Center, 
11
bacteria BT: organisms RT: algae microbiology DF: Unicellular, generally microscopic organisms having three typical forms: rod-shaped (bacillus), round (coccus), and spiral (spirillum).
The cytoplasm of most bacteria is surrounded by a cell wall; the nucleus contains DNA but lacks the nuclear membrane found in higher plants and animals.
[Concise Columbia Electronic Encyc, 1999] TNR: 177 bacteriology BT: microbiology RT: culturing (specimens) health and disease DF: Study of bacteria, especially in relation to medicine and agriculture.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 289 banding USE: plant and animal tagging TNR: 291 basement maps US+: bedrock geologic units maps and atlases TNR: 293 bathymetry UF: bathymetry data sea floor topography underwater contours BT: topography RT: geomorphology limnology ocean sciences sea floor characteristics DF: The data derived from the measurement of ocean depths and the charting of the topography of the ocean floor.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 295 bathymetry data USE: bathymetry TNR: 296 bathymetry measurement BT: geolocation measurement RT: geography sonar methods DF: Measurement of the ocean depths in order to determine the sea floor topography [Adapted from McGraw-Hill Dic. of Scientific and Technical Terms, 5th ed.]
12
TNR:
301
bedforms BT: sedimentary rocks RT: sedimentology DF: Any deviations from a flat layer of sediments or sedimentary rocks, generated by the flow on the layer (bed) of an alluvial channel.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 302 bedrock geologic units UF: geologic formations UF+: basement maps BT: stratigraphic sections RT: stratigraphy DF: Units of rock, usually solid, that underlie soil or other unconsolidated, superficial material.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 294 benthic ecosystems BT: aquatic ecosystems RT: aquatic biology ecology limnology marine biology DF: Ecosystems on the bottom or at the greatest depths of the ocean or other large body of water.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 235 beryllium isotope analysis BT: light stable isotope analysis DF: Method of age determination based on measurement of the activity of beryllium-10, used in dating deep-sea sediments, and in determining sedimentation rates.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 306 bibliographies BT: object types RT: documents TNR: 308 bioaccumulation UF: bioconcentration BT: ecological processes RT: ecology ecotoxicology DF: The accumulation of a substance, such as a toxic chemical, in various tissues of a living organism.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 309 biochemistry UF: chemistry (life sciences)
13
life sciences anthropogenic contamination atomic absorption analysis biogeochemical cycling carbon cycling carbon isotope analysis chemical analysis chromatography DNA sequencing electrophoresis flow cytometry food web gas chromatography isotopic analysis light stable isotope analysis liquid chromatography mass spectroscopy mercury contamination neutron activation analysis nutrient cycling oxygen isotope analysis particle-beam spectroscopy pesticide and herbicide contamination polymerase chain reaction tritium analysis DF: Study of the chemical substances and vital processes occurring in living organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 311 biocide contaminants USE: pesticide and herbicide contamination TNR: 312 bioconcentration USE: bioaccumulation TNR: 310 biodiversity UF: biological diversity diversity (biological) BT: population and community ecology NT: ecosystem diversity genetic diversity species diversity RT: biogeography ecological competition ecology endangered species endemic species invasive species life sciences native species nonindigenous species
BT: RT:
14
DF: (a) The number and variety of organisms found within a specified geographic region.
(b) The variability among living organisms on the earth, including the variability within and between species and within and between ecosystems.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 313 biogeochemical cycling UF: biogeochemical functioning biogeochemical processes decomposition (organic) organic decomposition BT: ecological processes NT: carbon cycling nutrient cycling RT: biochemistry decomposers ecology geochemistry DF: The cycling of chemical constituents through a biological system.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 320 biogeochemical functioning USE: biogeochemical cycling TNR: 321 biogeochemical processes USE: biogeochemical cycling TNR: 322 biogeography UF: animal distribution distribution of animals distribution of plants distribution of species plant distribution species distribution species geographic range UF+: species distribution maps BT: population and community ecology RT: biodiversity ecology ecosystem monitoring migration (organisms) migratory species population dynamics wildlife population management DF: The geographic distribution of organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 205 biographies USE: documents TNR: 335
15
bioinformatics USE: biological informatics TNR: 336 biologic classifications USE: biologic names and classifications TNR: 33 biologic names and classifications UF: biologic classifications BT: terminologies and classifications RT: systematics and taxonomy TNR: 18 biological and physical processes BT: topics NT: atmospheric and climatic processes ecological processes fires geologic and hydrologic processes ocean processes TNR: 69 biological diversity USE: biodiversity TNR: 314 biological informatics UF: bioinformatics BT: information sciences RT: life sciences DF: Development and use of computer, statistical, and other tools in the collection, organization, dissemination, and use of information to solve problems in the life sciences.
[USGS Center for Biological Informatics 
16
reintroduction (organisms) wildlife population management RT: ecosystem monitoring population and community ecology DF: Methods of monitoring and controlling all the organisms that constitute a specific group or occur in a specified habitat.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 341 biological productivity BT: ecological processes RT: ecology life sciences DF: The rate at which radiant energy and raw materials are used by producer organisms to form organic substances as food for consumer organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 343 biological remediation USE: bioremediation TNR: 344 biological sciences USE: life sciences TNR: 7 biology USE: life sciences TNR: 346 bionomics USE: ecology TNR: 358 bioremediation UF: biological remediation revegetation BT: remediation RT: ecology ecosystem monitoring DF: Use of biological agents, such as bacter
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 345 biosphere USE: ecosystems TNR: 361 biostratigraphy BT: geologic history RT: fossils ichnofossils paleontology
17
stratigraphy DF: Element of stratigraphy that deals with the distribution of fossils in the stratigraphic record and the organization of strata into units on the basis of their contained fossils.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 362 biota BT: RT: DF: English TNR: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) life sciences Combined flora and fauna of a region.
[American Heritage Dic. of the Language, 4th ed.] 365
biotelemetry USE: telemetry SN: Use another term with 'biotelemetry' to indicate the focus of the biological study, for example 'mammals'.
TNR: 367 bird banding USE: plant and animal tagging TNR: 369 birds UF: shorebirds waterfowl BT: vertebrates RT: ornithology DF: Belonging to the class Aves: bipedal vertebrate chordates with feathers, wings and a beak.
[Oxford University Press, 1996] TNR: 370 bituminous coal resources USE: coal resources TNR: 374 blizzards BT: storms DF: Violent snowstorms with winds blowing at a minimum speed of 35 miles (56 kilometers) per hour and visibility of less than one-quarter mile (400 meters) for three hours.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 86 bolide impacts US+: hazards meteorites TNR: 375 bolides USE: meteorites TNR: 377 books and book chapters
18
USE: TNR:
documents 378
borehole logging BT: field inventory and monitoring NT: borehole temperature logging electrical resistivity logging gamma-ray logging RT: geophysics stratigraphy DF: A survey operation in which instruments are lowered into a borehole to measure the physical characteristics of the borehole environment and the borehole itself as a function of depth.
[Adapted from Soc.
Professional Well Log Analysts Glossary, 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 380 botany BT: NT: life sciences palynology phycology RT: drilling and coring ferns and fern allies flowering plants forest resources gymnosperms liverworts and hornworts mosses mycology nonvascular plants paleobotany plants (organisms) producers (organisms) vascular plants vegetation DF: Science or study of plants.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 348 brachiopods USE: bryozoans and brachiopods TNR: 385 brown tides USE: algal blooms TNR: 179
19
bryozoans and brachiopods UF: brachiopods BT: invertebrates RT: invertebrate paleontology invertebrate zoology DF: Invertebrates belonging to the phylum Bryozoa or the phylum Brachiopoda.
TNR: 386 budget (USGS) USE: USGS budget TNR: 387 building stone resources BT: nonmetallic resources RT: economic geology rocks and deposits sedimentology DF: Deposits of any rock suitable for use in construction.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 389 business and economics UF: commerce economics BT: culture and demographics RT: social sciences DF: Business is the activity of producing and distributing commodities, and economics is the investigation of the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
[Adapted from Dic. of Cultural Literacy, 2nd ed.] TNR: 391 business partners (USGS) USE: USGS partnerships TNR: 393 butterflies and moths UF: lepidoptera moths BT: insects RT: entomology DF: Insects belonging to the order Lepidoptera.
Butterflies are smallbodied, active during daylight; moths are larger and nocturnal.
Larvae undergo metamorphosis via a pupa (chrysalis) to the adult form.
[Dic. of Biology, 3rd ed., Oxford Univ., 1996] TNR: 395 cadastral and legal land descriptions UF: land partitioning systems legal land descriptions UF+: cadastral maps BT: culture and demographics
20
administrative and political boundaries geography social sciences DF: Information in public records, surveys, or maps of the value, extent, and ownership of land as a basis of taxation.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 139 cadastral maps US+: cadastral and legal land descriptions maps and atlases TNR: 398 calcareous nannoplankton BT: algae RT: micropaleontology phycology plankton DF: Any of the chromatophore-bearing protists that normally produce coccoliths during some phase of their life cycle; also, in a broader sense, the morphologically diverse group of minute calcareous skeletal elements produced by coccolithophores.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 173 camera tows USE: underwater photography TNR: 403 capturing (animals) UF: trapping (animals) BT: field sampling RT: specimen collecting zoology DF: Collecting individual animals in the field by various methods in order to obtain information about the species or population and its ecology.
Capturing methods are adapted to the habits and habitats of the target species and include both live trapping and kill trapping methods.
TNR: 405 carbon cycling BT: biogeochemical cycling RT: biochemistry ecology geochemistry DF: Continued exchange and reactions of carbon in the biosphere, atmosphere and hydrosphere.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 325 carbon isotope analysis BT: light stable isotope analysis RT: biochemistry carbon-14 analysis geochemistry
RT:
21
DF: Experimental determination of the proportion of a given stable carbon isotope (C12 or C13) in a sample.
TNR: 408 carbon-14 analysis BT: radiometric dating RT: carbon isotope analysis geochronology DF: Use of a naturally radioactive carbon isotope with atomic mass 14 and half-life 5,730 years to determine the age of ancient organic, geologic, or archaeological specimens.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 409 careers in science USE: scientific careers TNR: 410 carnivores UF: predators BT: consumers (organisms) RT: ecology zoology DF: Any of various predatory, flesh-eating mammals of the order Carnivora, including the dogs, cats, bears, weasels, hyenas, and raccoons.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 412 cartographic data (digital) USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 415 cartography UF: digital cartography map making mapmaking mapping BT: geography RT: map coordinate systems maps and atlases DF: Science and art of making maps and charts and the study of maps and scientific documents and works of art.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 417 catalogs and indexes UF: indexes lists of publications metadata BT: object types RT: documents USGS clearinghouses TNR: 424 CD-ROM
22
USE: TNR: CDROM UF: BT: TNR:
CDROM 429 CD-ROM digital format 430
cell biology UF: cytology BT: life sciences RT: flow cytometry molecular biology DF: Branch of biology that deals with the formation, structure, and function of cells.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 349 checklists BT: documents TNR: 431 chemical analysis UF: geochemical surveys leaching (analytical method) mineralogical analysis BT: laboratory methods NT: at
[Adapted from Columbia Electronic Encyc., 1999] TNR: 276 chemical oceanography USE: marine chemistry TNR: 438 chemistry (Earth sciences) USE: geochemistry TNR: 23 chemistry (life sciences) USE: biochemistry TNR: 24
23
chloride concentration USE: salinity TNR: 115 chromatography BT: chemical analysis NT: gas chromatography liquid chromatography RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Any of various techniques for the separation of complex mixtures that rely on the differential affinities of substances for a gas or liquid mobile medium and for a stationary adsorbing medium through which they pass, such as paper, gelatin, or magnesia.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 434 chronostratigraphy USE: geologic history TNR: 441 circulation (lake) USE: lake circulation TNR: 442 circulation (ocean) USE: ocean circulation TNR: 1 circulation (water) USE: water circulation TNR: 2 classification schemes USE: terminologies and classifications TNR: 448 clay deposits BT: unconsolidated deposits RT: economic geology nonmetallic resources sedimentology DF: Deposits of soil containing a high percentage of fine particles and colloidal substances, becoming sticky and plastic when wet and forming hard lumps or clods when dry.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 450 clearinghouses (USGS) USE: USGS clearinghouses TNR: 451 cleavage (rock) USE: fracture (geologic) TNR: 452
24
climate USE: atmospheric and climatic processes TNR: 257 climate change UF: climatic change global climate change BT: atmospheric and climatic processes NT: desertification RT: climatology global change global warming greenhouse gases DF: Alterations in the characteristic weather of a region, particularly as regards temperature and precipitation, averaged over some significant interval of time.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 454 climatic change USE: climate change TNR: 455 climatology BT: atmospheric sciences RT: climate change desertification meteorology ocean circulation sea-level change DF: Study of the characteristic weather of a region, particularly as regards temperature and precipitation, averaged over some significant interval of time.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 274 coal bed methane resources USE: coalbed methane resources TNR: 459 coal resources UF: anthracite resources bituminous coal resources lignite resources subbituminous coal resources BT: nonrenewable energy resources RT: coalbed methane resources economic geology DF: Resources of a natural dark brown to black graphitelike material used as a fuel, formed from fossilized plants and consisting of amorphous carbon with various organic and some inorganic compounds.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 216 coalbed methane resources
25
coal bed methane resources methane resources (coalbed) BT: natural gas resources RT: coal resources economic geology DF: Resources of methane-rich gas generated and stored in coalbeds.
[USGS Fact Sheet FS-019-97, 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 239 coastal fisheries USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 80 coastal fishing USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 466 coelenterates UF: corals jellyfish sea anemones BT: invertebrates RT: invertebrate zoology reef ecosystems DF: Any multicelled invertebrates belonging to the phyllum Coelenterata.
Coelenterates exist both as free-swimming medusae (e.g., jellyfish) and as sedentary polyps.
Polyps may be colonial (e.g., corals) or solitary (e.g., sea anemones).
[Adapted from Dic. of Biology, 3rd ed., Oxford Univ., 1996] TNR: 469 collection of specimens USE: specimen collecting TNR: 473 college programs (USGS) USE: USGS college programs TNR: 474 colloquia (USGS) USE: USGS colloquia TNR: 476 colonization (organisms) USE: dispersal (organisms)
UF:
26
TNR:
478
coloring books USE: educational materials TNR: 480 coloring pages USE: educational materials TNR: 481 commerce USE: business and economics TNR: 392 commercial fishery resources BT: fishery resources RT: aquaculture aquatic biology ichthyology marine biology marine fishery resources DF: The stock of fisheries where fish and other seafood resources are taken for the purpose of marketing them.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 227 commercial water use BT: offstream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Use of water for motels, hotels, restaurants, office buildings, other commercial facilities, and institutions.
[USGS Glossary of water-use terminology, 
[Adapted from Community Ecology journal, 
27
spatial analysis statistical analysis topological analysis visualization methods TNR: 486 ..
"Computer program : a set of instructions suitable for processing by a computer in the form of source code or executable code.(USGS Manual) computer science BT: information sciences DF: Study of computers, including their design (architecture) and their uses for computations, data processing, and systems control.
[Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 495 coniferous forests ecosystems USE: forest ecosystems TNR: 497 conodonts BT: invertebrates RT: invertebrate paleontology micropaleontology DF: Members of an extinct group of small primitive fishlike chordates, preserved primarily in the form of their conelike teeth.
Conodonts are the most widespread Paleozoic microfossils and are important for biostratigraphic indexing.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 499 conservation USE: natural resource management TNR: 500 consumers (organisms) BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) NT: carnivores herbivores omnivores RT: ecology zoology DF: Organisms that are unable to manufacture food from nonliving matter but are dependent on the energy stored in other living things.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 414 contacts (geologic) USE: geologic contacts TNR: 503 contaminant transport BT: ecological processes RT: ecotoxicology DF: Process of the dispersion of contaminants through air, water, and soil.
TNR: 949
28
contaminants (anthropogenic) USE: anthropogenic contamination TNR: 218 contaminants (natural) USE: natural contaminants TNR: 505 continental lithosphere BT: lithosphere RT: tectonophysics DF: That part of the lithosphere that is not consistently underlain by an asthenosphere and is above sea level.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001]
[Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), 
TNR: 514 controlled vocabularies UF: thesauri BT: terminologies and classifications DF: Established lists of standardized terminology for use in the indexing and retrieval of information.
[National Library of Canada: Definitions, 
29
cooperative research 
core (Earth) BT: Earth structure NT: inner core (Earth) outer core (Earth) RT: geophysics DF: Central zone or nucleus of the Earth's interior at a depth of 2900 km. [Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 524 core analysis BT: laboratory methods RT: drilling and coring SN: Intended for broad use for the analysis of all types of core samples.
For example, analysis of core samples from a tree or ice mass as well as cores from geological strata or rocks.
The combination of this term with other terms will convey the context of the activity.
TNR: 528 core sampling USE: drilling and coring TNR: 530 coring USE: TNR: drilling and coring 93
correlation USE: regression analysis TNR: 532
30
CRADAs USE: TNR:
USGS cooperative research 
crenulation (geologic) USE: folding (geologic) TNR: 535 cross sections UF+: hydrographic sections BT: graphics DF: A diagram or drawing that shows features transected by a given plane.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 537 crust (Earth) BT: Earth structure NT: lithosphere RT: tectonophysics DF: Outermost layer or shell of the Earth, defined according to various criteria, including seismic velocity, density and composition.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 255 crustaceans BT: arthropods NT: ostracodes RT: invertebrate zoology shellfish DF: Anthropods belonging to the superclass Crustacea, characterized chiefly by the presence of two pairs of antennae on the head.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 247 cryology USE: glaciology TNR: 540 CTD measurement BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: limnology marine chemistry ocean sciences DF: Measurement method using an instrument composed of conductivity, temperature, and pressure sensors and used to measure conductivity and temperature (from which salinity can be calculated) as a function of depth in the ocean or other body of water [Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
31
business and economics cadastral and legal land descriptions RT: geography social sciences DF: Information about the characteristics of human populations and population segments.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 138 culturing (specimens) BT: laboratory methods RT: bacteriology microbiology DF: Growing microorganisms or other living matter in a specially prepared nutrient medium.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 543 Curie temperature analysis UF: temperature analysis (Curie) BT: paleomagnetic analysis RT: geophysics DF: Analysis of rock specimens using the Curie temperature point which is the temperature a ferromagnetic material loses its permanent magnetism.
[Adapted from Eric Weisstein's Treasure Trove of Physics, 
data archives (USGS) USE: USGS libraries and archives TNR: 554 data downloading (USGS) USE: USGS data downloading TNR: 555
32
data management USE: information management methods TNR: 557 databases USE: datasets TNR: 559 Datasets UF: data databases UF+: streamflow data water-quality data BT: object types NT: geospatial datasets hydrographic datasets time series datasets RT: USGS libraries and archives TNR: 553 ..DF Datasets: Database ­ a collection of interrelated data and information items stored together to serve one or more applications (USGS Survey Manual) deciduous forest ecosystems USE: forest ecosystems TNR: 561 decision support methods BT: management methods RT: geographic information systems (GIS) SN: Includes protocols for discussion and mechanisms for facilitating communication among disparate groups as well as mechanical and technological aids to analysis and understanding.
DF: Mathematical, analytical, and social procedures used to aid groups and individuals in the process of making decisions.
TNR: 562 decomposers BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: biogeochemical cycling ecology life sciences DF: Organisms, often bacteria or fungi, that feed on and break down dead plant or animal matter, thus making organic nutrients available to the ecosystem.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 327 decomposition (organic) USE: biogeochemical cycling TNR: 323 deep sea fisheries USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 81
33
deep sea fishing USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 563 demographics USE: culture and demographics TNR: 542 deposition (sediment) USE: sedimentation TNR: 564 depth-to maps US+: maps and atlases structure contours TNR: 567 desert ecosystems BT: terrestrial ecosystems RT: desertification ecology DF: Ecosystems in dry, often sandy regions of little rainfall, extreme temperatures, and sparse vegetation.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language,4th ed.] TNR: 569 desertification BT: climate change RT: climatology desert ecosystems ecology hazards land use change DF: The transformation of arable or habitable land to desert, as by a change in climate or destructive land use.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 458 developmental biology UF: embryology BT: life sciences RT: organism growth and development DF: Study of all aspects of development, from the genes and molecular events that control development to the structural changes that an organism undergoes as it develops.
[Adapted from Dynamic Development: The Foundations of Developmental Biology, 
34
DF: The process of chemical and physical change in deposited sediment during its conversion to rock.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 572 diagrams USE: graphics TNR: 573 diatoms BT: algae RT: micropaleontology phycology DF: Microscopic, single-celled plants of the class Bacillariophyceae, which grow in both marine and fresh water.
Diatoms secrete walls of silica, called frustules, in a great variety of forms.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 174 dictionaries USE: glossaries TNR: 574 digital application BT: digital format TNR: 576 digital audio BT: digital format TNR: 578 digital cartographic data USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 579 digital cartographic datasets USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 580 digital cartography USE: cartography TNR: 418 digital format BT: physical formats NT: CDROM digital application digital audio digital image digital text digital video DVD magnetic disk magnetic tape videodisk
35
TNR:
577
digital image BT: digital format TNR: 586 digital text BT: digital format TNR: 587 digital video BT: digital format TNR: 588 dinoflagellates BT: algae RT: micropaleontology phycology DF: One-celled microscopic flagellated organisms, chiefly marine and usually solitary, with resemblances to both animal and plant kingdoms.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 175 dinosaurs BT: reptiles RT: vertebrate paleontology DF: Any of various extinct, often gigantic, carnivorous or herbivorous reptiles of the orders Saurischia and Ornithischia that were chiefly terrestrial and existed during the Mesozoic Era.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 589 directories BT: object types RT: documents TNR: 591 disasters USE: hazards TNR: 592 disease USE: health and disease TNR: 596 disease (human) USE: environmental health (human) TNR: 598 disease vectors BT: health and disease RT: life sciences DF: Organisms (as an insect) that transmit a pathogen from one organism to another.
[Merriam-Webster's Medical Dic., 1997]
36
TNR:
600
dispersal (organisms) UF: colonization (organisms) BT: ecological processes RT: ecology life sciences migration (organisms) DF: Dissemination of offspring into areas having conditions favorable for their existence.
TNR: 479 dissertations USE: documents TNR: 601 dissolved oxygen USE: oxygen content (water) TNR: 77 distribution of animals USE: biogeography TNR: 1329 distribution of plants USE: biogeography TNR: 1328 distribution of species USE: biogeography TNR: 328 distribution services (USGS) USE: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 602 diversity (biological) USE: biodiversity TNR: 315 DNA sequencing UF: gene sequencing BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry genetics DF: Process of elucidating the nucleotide sequence of a gene.
[Dic. of Biology, Oxford Univ.
Press, 2000] TNR: 1333 documents UF: abstracts articles (publications) biographies books and book chapters
37
BT: NT:
RT:
TNR:
dissertations guidelines journal articles journals memos newsletters pamphlets, brochures, and booklets papers (publications) planning reports proceedings published series reports serial publications technical reports text documents theses transcripts workshop reports yearbooks object types checklists guidebooks manuals standards bibliographies catalogs and indexes directories policies and regulations 121
domestic water use UF: public water supply residential water use BT: offstream water use NT: drinking water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Use of water for household purposes, such as drinking, food preparation, bathing, washing clothes and dishes, flushing toilets, and watering lawns and gardens.
[USGS Glossary of water-use terminology, 
38
ice core sampling field sampling botany core analysis geology glaciology well drilling SN: Intended for broad use wherever coring is done.
For example, taking a core sample from a tree or ice mass as well as a core from geological strata or rocks.
The combination of this term with other terms will convey the context of the activity.
DF: Cutting into the subsurface, for example into underground strata or into a tree trunk, to remove material for examination.
TNR: 529 drinking water USE: drinking water use TNR: 625 drinking water use UF: drinking water BT: domestic water use RT: water quality TNR: 106 droughts BT: atmospheric and climatic processes RT: atmospheric sciences hazards DF: Extended periods of below average precipitation and depleted soil water storage.
[NaturalHazards.org 
UF+: BT: RT:
dynamic geology USE: tectonic processes TNR: 633 Earth characteristics BT: topics NT: atmospheric properties Earth structure geologic history geologic structure gravitational field (Earth) land surface characteristics magnetic field (Earth) ocean characteristics rocks and deposits snow and ice cover stratigraphic sections
39
topography RT: Earth sciences DF: Specifiable, definable or recognizable attributes of the Earth.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 261 Earth history BT: geologic history RT: geochemistry geology tectonophysics SN: Use for discussions of the structural and compositional changes that the Earth has undergone.
Apply to discussions of the whole Earth (or large sections of it) instead of to regional studies.
TNR: 640 Earth materials maps US+: engineering geology maps and atlases TNR: 641 Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) USE: USGS Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) TNR: 647 Earth sciences UF: geosciences BT: sciences NT: atmospheric sciences geochemistry geography geology geophysics glaciology hydrology limnology ocean sciences paleontology soil sciences RT: Earth characteristics natural resources scientific careers DF: All-embracing term for sciences related to the study of the Earth.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 273 Earth structure BT: Earth characteristics NT: core (Earth) crust (Earth) mantle (Earth) RT: geologic structure structural geology tectonic processes
40
DF: TNR:
tectonophysics Major interior structural features of the planet Earth.
525
earthquake activity maps US+: earthquake occurrences maps and atlases TNR: 660 earthquake epicenter maps US+: earthquake probabilities maps and atlases TNR: 668 earthquake forecasting USE: earthquake probabilities TNR: 670 earthquake hazards US+: earthquakes hazards TNR: 671 earthquake monitoring USE: seismic networking TNR: 672 earthquake occurrence maps US+: earthquake occurrences maps and atlases TNR: 661 earthquake occurrences UF+: earthquake activity maps earthquake occurrence maps earthquake seismology ground motion maps seismic hazard maps shaking maps (seismic) BT: earthquakes RT: seismology DF: Time, location, severity, and mechanism of earthquake events, including the frequency and history of events in a given area.
TNR: 659 earthquake prediction USE: earthquake probabilities TNR: 674 earthquake preparedness BT: hazard preparedness DF: Awareness of the consequences of earthquake events and actions to be taken before, during, or after events.
TNR: 675
41
earthquake probabilities UF: earthquake forecasting earthquake prediction UF+: earthquake epicenter maps seismicity distribution maps BT: risk assessment RT: earthquakes neotectonic processes DF: That aspect of seismology that deals with the physical conditions or indications that precede an earthquake, in order to predict the probability, size, time, and location of a quake.
TNR: 669 earthquake seismology US+: earthquake occurrences seismology TNR: 662 earthquakes UF+: earthquake hazards BT: geologic and hydrologic processes NT: earthquake occurrences RT: earthquake probabilities hazards seismology tectonic processes tectonophysics DF: Sudden movement of the earth's crust caused by the release of stress accumulated along geologic faults or by volcanic activity.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 666 echinoderms BT: invertebrates RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any solitary marine benthic (rarely pelagic) invertebrates, belonging to the phylum Echinodermata, characterized by radial symmetry, an endoskeleton formed of plates or ossicles composed of crystalline calcite, and a water-vascular system.
Includes echinozoans, asterozoans, crinozoans, and homalozoans subphylums.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 678 echo sounding USE: sonar methods TNR: 692 ecologic succession USE: succession (biological) TNR: 679 ecological competition BT: ecological processes RT: biodiversity
42
community ecology ecology endangered species DF: Simultaneous demand by two or more organisms for limited environmental resources, such as nutrients, living space, or light.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 319 ecological models US+: ecological processes models TNR: 681 ecological processes UF: environmental processes UF+: ecological models BT: biological and physical processes NT: algal blooms bioaccumulation biogeochemical cycling biological productivity contaminant transport dispersal (organisms) ecological competition ecosystem functions eutrophication extinction and extirpation habitat alteration migration (organisms) pollination succession (biological) RT: ecology population and community ecology DF: Dynamic biogeochemical interactions that occur among and between biotic and abiotic components of the biosphere.
TNR: 182 ecology UF: bionomics BT: life sciences RT: animal behavior anthropogenic contamination aquatic biology aquatic ecosystems benthic ecosystems bioaccumulation biodiversity biogeochemical cycling biogeography biological productivity bioremediation carbon cycling carnivores coastal ecosystems
43
community ecology consumers (organisms) decomposers desert ecosystems desertification dispersal (organisms) ecological competition ecological processes ecosystem functions ecosystem monitoring ecosystems ecotoxicology endangered species endemic species estuarine ecosystems eutrophication extinction and extirpation fires food web forest ecosystems forest resources freshwater ecosystems global change global warming grassland ecosystems habitat alteration herbivores human impacts invasive species land use change long-term ecological monitoring marine ecosystems mercury contamination migration (organisms) migratory species native species nonindigenous species nutrient cycling omnivores pesticide and herbicide contamination plot sampling pollinators pollution population and community ecology population dynamics producers (organisms) reef ecosystems remediation shrubland ecosystems succession (biological) terrestrial ecosystems tundra ecosystems vegetation waste treatment and disposal
44
wetland ecosystems wetland functions DF: Study of the relationships between organisms and their environment, including the study of communities, patterns of life, natural cycles, relationships of organisms to each other, biogeography, and population changes.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 332 economic geology BT: geology RT: building stone resources clay deposits coal resources coalbed methane resources gas hydrate resources gem resources gold ores gravel deposits metallic ores mineral resources natural gas resources nonmetallic resources nonrenewable energy resources nonrenewable resources oil resources oil sand resources oil shale resources sand deposits soil resources DF: Study and analysis of geologic bodies and materials that can be profitably used, including fuels, metals, nonmetallic minerals, and water; the application of geologic knowledge and theory to the search for and the understanding of mineral deposits.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 690 economics USE: business and economics TNR: 14 ecosystem diversity BT: biodiversity DF: The variety of habitats and communities of different species that interact in a complex web of interdependent relationships, characterized by fluid "boundaries" between ecosystems and communities.
[Adapted from Oceanus, 
ecosystem functions UF: ecosystem services UF+: estuarine ecosystem functions BT: ecological processes NT: wetland functions RT: ecology
45
DF: The collective life activities (e.g., feeding, growing, moving, excreting waste) of organisms in an ecosystem and the corresponding effects these natural activities have on the physical and chemical conditions of their environment.
[Adapted from Biodiversity and Ecosystem Functioning: Maintaining Natural Life Support Processes, 
[Adapted from Ecological Principles and Guidelines for Managing the Use of Land, 
ecosystem monitoring BT: field inventory and monitoring NT: long-term ecological monitoring RT: biogeography biological population management bioremediation ecology ecosystem management natural resource management population and community ecology relative abundance analysis remediation DF: Recording, evaluating and actively intervening over time in the interaction of living and nonliving elements in a specific environment.
TNR: 333 ecosystem services USE: ecosystem functions TNR: 693 ecosystems UF: biosphere BT: population and community ecology NT: aquatic ecosystems terrestrial ecosystems wetland ecosystems RT: ecology habitats DF: Ecological communities together with their environments, functioning as units.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 234 ecotoxicology UF: environmental toxicology toxicology
46
life sciences anthropogenic contamination bioaccumulation contaminant transport ecology hazards human impacts mercury contamination natural contaminants pesticide and herbicide contamination plant and animal testing pollution radon therapeutic methods toxic radionuclides (natural) toxic trace elements (natural) DF: Field of study which integrates the ecological and effects of chemical pollutants on populations, communities with the fate (transport, transformation and breakdown) of the environment.
[Forbes 
Ecotoxicology in Practice.
Chapman 
TNR: 685 educational games USE: educational materials TNR: 696 educational materials UF: activity books coloring books coloring pages curriculum enrichment materials educational games instructional materials learning web lesson plans paper models teaching guides teaching packets BT: object types RT: posters TNR: 134 educational services (USGS) USE: USGS educational services TNR: 704 El Nino USE: ocean-atmosphere interaction TNR: 706 electrical resistivity logging UF: resistivity sounding BT: borehole logging
BT: RT:
toxicological and ecosystems such pollutants in Theory and
47
electromagnetic surveying stratigraphy DF: Recording of electrical resistivity soundings, using an array of electrodes in boreholes, to determine depth to geological interfaces.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 381 electromagnetic surveying UF: magnetic surveying magnetotelluric sounding BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: aeromagnetic surveying electrical resistivity logging DF: Methods of imaging near-surface earth structures based on their electrical and magnetic response to natural or artificial electric fields.
[see 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 708 electrophoresis BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry DF: Laboratory technique that uses the migration, under the influence of an electric field, of charged particles within a stationary liquid to study macromolecules.
The liquid may be a normal solution or held upon a porous medium (e.g. starch, acrylamide gel, or cellulose acetate).
The rate at which migration occurs varies according to the charge on the particle and also its size and shape.
[Adapted from Dic. of Earth Sciences, Oxford Univ.
Press 1999] TNR: 1334
RT:
embryology USE: developmental biology TNR: 571 emergency management resources USE: hazards TNR: 711 employment opportunities (USGS) USE: USGS employment and volunteer opportunities TNR: 712 endangered species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic)
48
biodiversity ecological competition ecology life sciences DF: A species present in such small numbers that it is at risk of extinction.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 317 endemic species BT: native species RT: biodiversity ecology life sciences DF: Plant and animal species that are native to and confined to a certain region.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 714 endocrinology BT: anatomy and physiology RT: health and disease DF: Study of the glands and hormones of the body and their related disorders.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 198 energy sources (nonrenewable) USE: nonrenewable energy resources TNR: 715 energy sources (renewable) USE: renewable energy resources TNR: 719 engineering geology UF+: Earth materials maps engineering geology maps geotechnical properties maps rock mechanics maps BT: engineering sciences RT: geology liquefaction remediation DF: Geology as applied to engineering practice, especially mining and civil engineering.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 642 engineering geology maps US+: engineering geology maps and atlases TNR: 723 engineering sciences UF+: engineering seismology BT: sciences
RT:
49
engineering geology hydraulic engineering RT: instrument design and development mining hazards scientific careers DF: Sciences applying scientific and mathematical principles to practical ends such as the design, manufacture, and operation of efficient and economical structures, machines, processes, and systems.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 593 engineering seismology US+: engineering sciences seismology TNR: 726 entomology BT: invertebrate zoology RT: arachnids butterflies and moths insects pollinators DF: Scientific study of insects.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 729 environmental analysis USE: environmental assessment TNR: 731 environmental assessment UF: environmental analysis environmental impact assessment BT: management methods DF: Assessment to appraise the effect of a proposed project on the aggregate of social and physical conditions that influence a community or ecosystem.
The assessment is often prepared to determine the need for a formal environmental impact statement.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 732 environmental hazards USE: hazards TNR: 733 environmental health (human) UF: disease (human) health (human) human disease human health BT: health and disease NT: human environmental safety RT: human impacts social sciences
NT:
50
DF: TNR:
toxic radionuclides (natural) toxic trace elements (natural) virology Effects of the environment on human health.
599
environmental impact assessment USE: environmental assessment TNR: 25 environmental management USE: natural resource management TNR: 738 environmental planning USE: natural resource management TNR: 739 environmental pollutants USE: anthropogenic contamination natural contaminants TNR: 219 environmental processes USE: ecological processes TNR: 683 environmental toxicology USE: ecotoxicology TNR: 16 eolian sediments USE: unconsolidated deposits TNR: 65 erosion BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geomorphology glaciology hydrology sedimentology watershed management DF: Mechanical destruction of the land and the removal of material (such as soil) by running water (including rainfall), waves and currents, moving ice, or wind.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 740 ESICs USE: TNR: USGS Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) 742
estuarine circulation US+: estuarine ecosystems water circulation
51
TNR:
444
estuarine currents US+: estuarine ecosystems water circulation TNR: 445 estuarine ecosystem functions US+: ecosystem functions estuarine ecosystems TNR: 694 estuarine ecosystems UF+: estuarine circulation estuarine currents estuarine ecosystem functions BT: aquatic ecosystems RT: aquatic biology ecology DF: Ecological communities at the seaward ends or tidal mouths of rivers where fresh water meets seawater and where tidal effects are evident.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 236 eutrophication BT: ecological processes RT: ecology limnology oxygen content (water) pollution DF: Aging of a lake or slow-moving stream by biological enrichment of its water.
The process can result in waters rich in mineral and organic nutrients that promote a proliferation of plant life, especially algae, which reduces the dissolved oxygen content and often causes the extinction of other organisms.
[Adapted from Concise Columbia Electronic Encyclopedia, 1999 
52
exploration seismology US+: natural resource exploration seismology TNR: 748 extinction and extirpation UF: extirpation BT: ecological processes RT: ecology life sciences DF: Disappearance of species of living organisms.
[Columbia Electronic Encyc., 1999] TNR: 687 extirpation USE: extinction and extirpation TNR: 749 facilities (USGS) USE: USGS facilities TNR: 750 faci
TNR: 753 fax-on-demand (USGS) USE: USGS fax-on-demand services TNR: 755 ferns and fern allies BT: vascular plants RT: botany DF: Any of numerous flowerless, seedless vascular plants having roots, stems, and fronds and reproducing by spores.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 757 field centers (USGS) USE: USGS field centers
53
TNR:
759
field experiments BT: field methods DF: Deliberate arrangement of objects and events in the field so as to observe the behavioral response of natural systems or organisms.
TNR: 761 field inventory and monitoring UF: field monitoring field observation reconnaissance UF+: ocean current measurement ocean monitoring ocean wave measurement precipitation measurements rainfall measurements river discharge monitoring snowfall measurements volcano monitoring weather monitoring weather observations BT: field methods NT: acoustic methods borehole logging CTD measurement ecosystem monitoring electromagnetic surveying handheld field spectroscopy seismic methods streamflow monitoring telemetry tiltmeter measurement video monitoring vocalization methods RT: faunal and floral census SN: In general, this category excludes sampling programs in which materials are obtained in the field and brought back to a laboratory for study and analysis.
DF: Direct observation of processes, events, and objects in the natural setting.
TNR: 131 field methods BT: methods NT: field experiments field inventory and monitoring field sampling geolocation measurement DF: Investigative methods away from the laboratory and esp. outdoors, in which an investigator makes first hand observations and collects data and samples.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 762
54
field monitoring USE: field inventory and monitoring TNR: 763 field observation USE: field inventory and monitoring TNR: 764 field sampling UF: inventory UF+: fish inventories BT: field methods NT: animal tracking capturing (animals) drilling and coring plant and animal tagging plot sampling sexing (plants 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 406 field trip guidebooks USE: guidebooks TNR: 787 figures (illustrations) USE: graphics TNR: 788 film BT: TNR: non-digital format 789
fire preparedness US+: fires hazard preparedness TNR: 54 fires UF: UF+: BT: RT: fires (uncontrolled) wildfires fire preparedness biological and physical processes atmospheric sciences controlled fires ecology hazards human impacts
55
SN: Use for fires that occur naturally in open areas, such as forests or fields.
For fires set as part of natural resource management, use 'controlled fires'.
DF: Combustion, marked by flames or intense heat, in natural settings, often ignited by lightning and human activities.
TNR: 513 fires (controlled) USE: controlled fires TNR: 512 fires (uncontrolled) USE: fires TNR: 790 fish UF: fishes UF+: fish inventories BT: vertebrates RT: ichthyology DF: Cold-blooded aquatic vertebrates of the superclass Pisces, characteristically having fins, gills, and a streamlined body.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 792 fish farming USE: aquaculture TNR: 226 fish inventories US+: field sampling fish TNR: 779 fishery management BT: biological population management TNR: 67 fishery resources BT: renewable resources NT: commercial fishery resources inland fishery resources marine fishery resources recreational fishery resources subsistence fishery resources RT: aquaculture aquatic biology ichthyology marine biology overfishing DF: The stock of anadromous, marine, and freshwater fish in fishing areas of commercial, subsistence, and recreational value.
TNR: 228
56
fishes USE: TNR:
fish 793
fission-track dating UF: age dating (fission-track) fission-track method BT: laboratory methods RT: geochronology radiometric dating DF: Method of calculating an age in years, for micas, tektites, meteorites and other such materials, by determining the ratio of the spontaneous fission-track density to induced fission tracks.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 798 fission-track method USE: fission-track dating TNR: 799 flatworms BT: worms RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any of various parasitic and nonparasitic worms of the phylum Platyhelminthes, such as a tapeworm or a planarian, characteristically having a soft, flat, bilaterally symmetrical body and no body cavity.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 800 flood preparedness US+: floods hazard preparedness TNR: 56 flooding (controlled) USE: controlled flooding TNR: 515 floods UF+: BT: RT: flood preparedness geologic and hydrologic processes controlled flooding hazards hydrology surface water (non-marine) watershed management DF: Overflowing by water of the normal confines of a stream or other body of water, or accumulation of water by drainage over areas which are not normally submerged.
[Lo, Glossary of Hydrology, 1992] TNR: 516 floral census USE: faunal and floral census TNR: 754
57
flow cytometry BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry cell biology DF: Technique in which cells are tagged with a fluorescent dye and then directed single file through a laser beam.
The intensity of fluorescence induced by the laser beam is proportional to the amount of DNA in the cells.
[Concise Medical Dic., Oxford Univ.
Press, 1998] TNR: 1331 flowering plants BT: vascular plants RT: botany DF: Angiosperms, plants with true flowers, in which the seeds, resulting from double fertilization, are enclosed in an ovary, comprising the fruit.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 803 fluid migration USE: groundwater flow TNR: 804 folding UF: BT: RT: (geologic) crenulation (geologic) geologic structure structural geology tectonic processes DF: Geologic structure consisting of a curve or bend of a planar element such as rock strata, bedding planes, foliation, or cleavage.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 536 foliation (geologic) BT: geologic structure RT: glaciation structural geology tectonic processes DF: Geologic structure consisting of a planar or layered arrangement of textural features in any type of rock and in glaciers.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 806 food chain USE: food web TNR: 807 food cycle USE: food web TNR: 809 food web UF: food chain food cycle
58
trophic level dynamics trophic relationships BT: nutrient cycling RT: biochemistry ecology DF: Complex of interrelated food chains in an ecological community.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 808 foraminifera USE: protists DF: Protozoans belonging to the subclass Sarcodina, order Foraminifera, characterized by the presence of a test of one to many chambers composed of secreted calcite (rarely silica or argonite) or of agglutinated particles.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 812 foreign species USE: nonindigenous specie
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 498 forest resources UF: forestry BT: renewable resources RT: botany ecology forest ecosystems SN: Use for timber and other resources of forests with economic value.
TNR: 817 forestry USE: forest resources TNR: 818 format USE: TNR: physical formats 819
fossils BT: rocks and deposits NT: ichnofossils
59
biostratigraphy micropaleontology paleontology trilobites DF: Remains, traces or imprints of a plant or animal that have been preserved in the Earth's crust since some past geologic or prehistoric time; loosely, any evidence of past life.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 635 fracture (geologic) UF: cleavage (rock) jointing (geologic) BT: geologic structure RT: structural geology tectonic processes DF: Geologic structure consisting of any surface within a geologic material across which there is no cohesion, including cracks, joints, and faults.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 453 Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs) USE: USGS customer support and user feedback TNR: 823 freshwater (ground) USE: groundwater TNR: 824 freshwater (surface) USE: surface water (non-marine) TNR: 825 freshwater ecosystems UF: lake ecosystems pond ecosystems spring ecosystems stream ecosystems UF+: river ecosystems BT: aquatic ecosystems RT: aquatic biology ecology groundwater limnology surface water (non-marine) DF: Ecosystems in bodies of water that are not salty.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 237 fungi BT: RT: organisms mycology
RT:
60
DF: Eukaryotic organisms of the kingdom Fungi, which lack chlorophyll and vascular tissue and range in form from a single cell to a body mass of branched filamentous hyphae that often produce specialized fruiting bodies.
The kingdom includes the yeasts, molds, smuts, and mushrooms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 831 future time period USE: projected time period TNR: 832 game management BT: wildlife population management RT: wildlife biology TNR: 834 game species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: vertebrate zoology wildlife biology DF: Species of wild animals, birds, or fish hunted for food or sport.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 835 gamma-ray logging BT: borehole logging RT: stratigraphy DF: Recording of a radioactivity log curve of the intensity of broadspectrum, undifferentiated natural gamma radiation emitted from the rocks in a cased or uncased borehole.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 382 gamma-ray spectrometric surveying USE: aeroradiometric surveying TNR: 154 gas chromatography BT: chromatography RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Chromatography in which the substance to be separated into its components is diffused along with a carrier gas through a liquid or solid adsorbent for differential adsorption.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 439 gas hydrate resources BT: natural gas resources RT: economic geology
61
DF: Resources of gas hydrate, a crystalline solid, whose building blocks consist of a gas molecule surrounded by a cage of water molecules.
Many gases have molecular sizes suitable to form hydrate, including such naturally occurring gases as carbon dioxide, hydrogen sulfide, and several low-carbonnumber hydrocarbons, but most marine gas hydrates that have been analyzed are methane hydrates.
[USGS: Woods Hole Field Center: Gas Hydrate: what is it? 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 839 gemology USE: mineralogy TNR: 840 gene sequencing USE: DNA sequencing TNR: 1335 genetic diversity BT: biodiversity DF: Variation in genes in a population pool that contributes to the ability of organisms to evolve and adapt to new conditions.
[Adapted from Oceanus, 
genetics UF: heredity BT: life sciences RT: DNA sequencing molecular biology polymerase chain reaction DF: Science that deals with the materials and processes of characteristics or features which are inheritable from generation to generation.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 351 geochemical anomaly maps US+: geochemistry maps and atlases TNR: 842 geochemical processes
62
BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geochemistry DF: Processes affecting the amount, distribution, or structure of chemical elements in air, water, soil, rocks, and minerals.
TNR: 843 geochemical surveys USE: chemical analysis TNR: 432 geochemistry UF: chemistry (Earth sciences) UF+: geochemical anomaly maps BT: Earth sciences NT: soil chemistry water chemistry RT: atomic absorption analysis biogeochemical cycling carbon cycling carbon isotope analysis chemical analysis chromatography Earth history gas chromatography geochemical processes isotopic analysis light stable isotope analysis liquid chromatography mass spectroscopy metamorphism (geological) neutron activation analysis oxygen isotope analysis particle-beam spectroscopy tritium analysis DF: Study of the distribution and amounts of chemical elements in minerals, ores, rocks, soil, water, and the atmosphere, and the study of the circulation of the elements in nature, on the basis of the properties of their atoms and ions.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 650 geochronology BT: geology RT: carbon-14 analysis fission-track dating geologic time scales radiometric dating rubidium-strontium age analysis stratigraphy tree ring analysis uranium-lead analysis uranium-thorium analysis DF: Science of dating and determining the time sequence of events in the history of the Earth.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 845
63
geodata USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 846 geodesy BT: geophysics RT: geography land surveying DF: Science concerned with (a) the determination of the size and shape of the Earth and the precise location of points on its surface; (b) the gravitational field of the Earth and temporal variations such as Earth tides, polar motion, and rotation of the Earth.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 645 geographic boundaries USE: administrative and political boundaries TNR: 19 geographic coordinate systems USE: map coordinate systems TNR: 848 geographic information sciences USE: geography TNR: 849 geographic information system (GIS) datasets USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 850 geographic information systems (GIS) UF: GIS BT: information system design and development RT: decision support methods geography geolocation measurement geospatial datasets GPS measurement information management methods information sciences map coordinate systems SN: Use this term only for information that is about GIS and not for the use of GIS in applications and projects.
DF: Computer program and associated databases that store, integrate, analyze, and process geospatial data.
Data is usually organized in layers containing distinct classes of geographic entities, such as hydrologic, cultural, and topographic features.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 851 geographic names and classifications UF: gazetteers
64
BT: RT: TNR:
place names placenames terminologies and classifications maps and atlases 838
geography UF: geographic information sciences BT: Earth sciences NT: cartography RT: administrative and political boundaries aeromagnetic surveying aeroradiometric surveying altimetry measurement AVHRR bathymetry measurement cadastral and legal land descriptions culture and demographics geodesy geographic information systems (GIS) geolocation measurement GPS measurement hyperspectral imaging IFSAR image analysis infrared imaging land surface characteristics land surveying land use change LIDAR map coordinate systems microwave imaging multispectral imaging panchromatic imaging radar imaging remote sensing SLAR SMMR spatial analysis SSM/I thermal imaging topography topological analysis visible light imaging DF: Study of all aspects of the Earth's surface including its natural and political divisions, the distribution and differentiation of areas and, often, human interactions with the environment.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 422 geohistory USE: geologic history TNR: 855
65
geohydrology USE: hydrogeology TNR: 856 geolocation measurement UF: location measurement navigating orienteering BT: field methods NT: altimetry measurement bathymetry measurement GPS measurement land surveying RT: geographic information systems (GIS) geography DF: Methods for establishing a geographic location on the surface of the Earth.
TNR: 190 geologic and hydrologic processes UF: hydrologic processes lithification BT: biological and physical processes NT: diagenesis earthquakes erosion floods geochemical processes glaciation groundwater flow heat flow (Earth) hydrothermal processes isostasy land subsidence landslides liquefaction metamorphism (geological) river discharge sediment transport sedimentation streamflow tectonic processes volcanic activity water circulation RT: geology hydrology tsunamis TNR: 446 geologic contacts UF: contacts (geologic) BT: stratigraphic sections NT: unconformities RT: stratigraphy
66
DF: Plane or irregular surface between two types or ages of rock; examples are faults, intrusive borders, bedding planes separating distinct strata, and unconformities.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 504 geologic formations USE: bedrock geologic units TNR: 304 geologic hazards USE: hazards TNR: 875 geologic history UF: chronostratigraphy geohistory BT: Earth characteristics NT: biostratigraphy Earth history lithostratigraphy RT: geologic time scales geology paleontology paleoseismology stratigraphy DF: Record (and inferred reconstruction) of the origin and development of the Earth since its formation.
TNR: 363 geologic maps US+: geology maps and atlases TNR: 878 geologic names and classifications BT: terminologies and classifications TNR: 879 geologic sections USE: stratigraphic sections TNR: 880 geologic structure BT: Earth characteristics NT: folding (geologic) foliation (geologic) fracture (geologic) lineation (geologic) structure contours RT: Earth structure stratigraphic sections structural geology
67
DF: General disposition, attitude, arrangement, and relative positions of the rock masses of a region or area; the sum total of the structural features of an area, resulting from such deformational processes as faulting, folding, and igneous intrusion.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 636 geologic time period BT: time periods RT: geologic time scales SN: Also use an authoritative list recognized by the USGS to indicate the specific geologic time period(s) and/or use a range of prehistoric dates as the dates of coverage.
DF: Period of time extending from the end of the formative period of the Earth as a separate planetary body to the beginning of written history.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 882 geologic time scales BT: object types RT: geochronology geologic history geologic time period DF: Arbitrary chronologic arrangement or sequence of geologic events, used as a measure of the relative or absolute duration or age of any part of geologic time.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 876 geologic units USE: stratigraphic sections TNR: 884 geological oceanography USE: marine geology TNR: 885 geology UF+: geologic maps subsurface maps BT: Earth sciences NT: economic geology geochronology geomorphology hydrogeology marine geology mineralogy petrology sedimentology stratigraphy structural geology volcanology RT: drilling and coring Earth history engineering geology geologic and hydrologic processes
68
geologic history metamorphism (geological) DF: Study of the planet Earth - the materials of which it is made, the processes that act on these materials, the products formed, and the history of the planet and its life forms since its origin.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 651 geomagnetic field USE: magnetic field (Earth) TNR: 28 geomagnetics USE: magnetic field (Earth) TNR: 892 geomagnetism USE: magnetic field (Earth) TNR: 893 geomorphology BT: geology RT: bathymetry erosion land subsidence land surface characteristics landslides topography DF: Science that treats the general configuration of the Earth's surface; specifically the classification, description, nature, origin, and development of landforms and their relationships to underlying structures, and the history of geologic changes as recorded by these surface features.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 888 geophysical maps US+: geophysics maps and atlases TNR: 894 geophysics UF+: geophysical maps BT: Earth sciences NT: geodesy marine geophysics seismology tectonophysics RT: borehole logging borehole temperature logging core (Earth) Curie temperature analysis gravitational field (Earth) heat flow (Earth) inner core (Earth)
69
isostasy laboratory-induced magnetization analysis magnetic field (Earth) magnetic hysteresis analysis magnetic susceptibility analysis mantle (Earth) metamorphism (geological) natural remanent magnetization analysis outer core (Earth) paleomagnetic analysis DF: Study of the Earth by quantitative physical methods.
Basic divisions include solid-earth geophysics, physics of the atmosphere and hydrosphere, and solar-terrestrial physics.
(It is sometimes used to include the instrumental study of the Moon and planets).
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 646 geosciences USE: Earth sciences TNR: 649 geospatial analysis BT: spatial analysis RT: image analysis topological analysis DF: Study of the distribution and association of Earth phenomena, including cultural and social concerns, that include singular or multiple processes operating in concert in some identified region.
Geographic information systems and remote sensing are used to analyze multivariate geospatial data.
[Adapted from http://www.weber.edu/Geosciences/Geospatial.html] TNR: 1336
geospatial data USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 896 geospatial datasets UF: cartographic data (digital) digital cartographic data digital cartographic datasets geodata geographic information system (GIS) datasets geospatial data GIS datasets BT: datasets RT: geographic information systems (GIS) hydrographic datasets TNR: 416 geostatistics USE: statistical analysis
70
SN: Use a more specific 'statistical analysis' term or combine an Earth science or topic term with 'statistical analysis'.
TNR: 898 geotechnical properties maps US+: engineering geology maps and atlases TNR: 724 geothermal resources BT: renewable energy resources RT: hydrogeology volcanology DF: Sources of power obtained by using heat from the Earth's interior, mostly from regions of active volcanism.
[Encyclopedia Britannica, 1999-2001] TNR: 721 geothermics USE: heat flow (Earth) TNR: 76 GIS USE: TNR: geographic information systems (GIS) 852
GIS datasets USE: geospatial datasets TNR: 897 glacial geology USE: glaciology TNR: 864 glaciation BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: foliation (geologic) glaciology snow and ice cover DF: The geologic processes of glacial activity, including erosion and deposition, and the resulting effects of such action on the Earth's surface.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 865 glaciers USE: snow and ice cover TNR: 899 glaciology UF: cryology glacial geology BT: Earth sciences RT: drilling and coring erosion glaciation
71
isostasy snow and ice cover DF: a) Study of all aspects of snow and ice; the science that treats quantitatively the whole range of processes associated with all forms of solid existing water.
b) Study of existing glaciers and ice sheets, and of their physical properties.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 541 global change BT: topics NT: global warming RT: atmospheric sciences climate change ecology ocean sciences sea-level change DF: Documenting, analyzing, and modeling the character of past and present environments and the geological, biological, hydrological, and geochemical processes involved in environmental change so that future environmental changes and impacts can be anticipated.
[USGS Global Change Research, 
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 900 glossaries UF: dictionaries lexicons BT: terminologies and classifications TNR: 575 gold ores BT: metallic ores RT: economic geology mineralogy
72
DF: Naturally occurring materials from which gold, a soft, heavy, yellow, isometric mineral, the native metallic element Au, can be profitably extracted.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 904 governmental units USE: administrative and political boundaries TNR: 136 GPS measurement UF: global positioning measurement BT: geolocation measurement RT: geographic information systems (GIS) geography DF: Measurement using the Global Positioning System, a system of satellites for identifying earth locations.
By triangulation of signals from three of the satellites, a receiving unit can pinpoint its current location anywhere on earth to within a few meters.
[Adapted from Computer Desktop Encyclopedia, 2001] TNR: 861 grain-size analysis UF: grainsize analysis granulometry particle-size analysis BT: laboratory methods NT: sieve-size analysis RT: sedimentology DF: Determination of the statistical proportions or distribution of particles of defined size fractions of a soil, sediment, or rock.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 905 grainsize analysis USE: grain-size analysis TNR: 94 grants (USGS) USE: USGS contracts and grants TNR: 909 granulometry USE: grain-size analysis TNR: 906 graphics UF: 3-D graphics 3-D imagery diagrams drawings figures (illustrations) illustrations BT: object types NT: animations
73
RT: TNR: graphs UF+: BT: TNR:
cross sections graphs audiovisual materials images 118 seismic profiles seismograms graphics 911
grassland ecosystems UF: mixed grass ecosystems plains ecosystems prairie ecosystems short grass ecosystems tall grass ecosystems BT: terrestrial ecosystems RT: ecology DF: Ecosystems in areas, such as a prairies or meadows, of grass or grasslike vegetation.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 914 gravel deposits BT: unconsolidated deposits RT: economic geology nonmetallic resources sedimentology DF: Unconsolidated mixture of rock fragments or pebbles [American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.]
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 643 gravity USE: gravitational field (Earth) TNR: 921 gravity anomaly maps US+: gravitational field (Earth) maps and atlases TNR: 922
74
gravity field USE: gravitational field (Earth) TNR: 923 gray water USE: wastewater use TNR: 924 greenhouse gases BT: atmospheric composition RT: atmospheric sciences climate change ozone layer DF: Atmospheric gases (carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, water vapor, and manmade gases such as chlorofluorocarbons) that allow radiation from the sun to reach the earth unimpeded and absorb infrared radiation from the Earth's surface, trapping the heat in the atmosphere.
[Adapted from 
75
DF: That part of the subsurface water that is in the zone of saturation, including underground streams.
Loosely, all subsurface water as distinct from surface water.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 240 groundwater flow UF: fluid migration ground-water flow groundwater movement UF+: groundwater flow modeling BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: groundwater hydrogeology DF: Movement, or flow, of water in the saturated zone in the subsurface where all interstices are filled with water under pressure greater than that of the atmosphere, whether naturally or artificially induced.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 805 groundwater flow modeling US+: groundwater flow mathematical modeling TNR: 932 groundwater geology USE: hydrogeology TNR: 934 groundwater movement USE: groundwater flow TNR: 933 groundwater quality UF: ground-water quality BT: water quality RT: groundwater hydrology water chemistry DF: Fitness for use of that part of the subsurface water that is in the zone of saturation, including underground streams.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 931 guidebooks UF: field trip guidebooks BT: documents TNR: 621 guidelines USE: documents TNR: 604 gymnosperms BT: vascular plants
76
RT: botany DF: Plants whose seeds are commonly in cones and never enclosed in an ovary.
Includes cycad, ginkgo, pine, fir, and spruce.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 935 habitat alteration UF: habitat destruction habitat fragmentation BT: ecological processes RT: ecology DF: Changes in the particular environments or places where organisms or species tend to live.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 688 habitat destruction USE: habitat alteration TNR: 936 habitat fragmentation USE: habitat alteration TNR: 937 habitats BT: population and community ecology RT: ecosystems SN: Use
DF: Particular environments or places where organisms or species tend to live; a more locally circumscribed portion of the total environment.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 52 hand-held field spectroscopy USE: handheld field spectroscopy TNR: 97 handheld field spectroscopy UF: hand-held field spectroscopy BT: field inventory and monitoring DF: Use of portable equipment to measure spectral reflectance of materials in the field.
TNR: 773 hardness (water) USE: water hardness TNR: 939 harmful algal blooms US+: algal blooms hazards TNR: 180
77
hazard preparedness UF+: fire preparedness flood preparedness landslide preparedness tsunami preparedness BT: management methods NT: earthquake preparedness DF: Awareness of the consequences of hazards and actions to be taken in response before, during, or after hazards occur or are encountered.
TNR: 53 hazards UF: disasters emergency management resources environmental hazards geologic hazards UF+: bolide impacts earthquake hazards harmful algal blooms meteor impacts meteorite impacts BT: topics RT: algal blooms desertification droughts earthquakes ecotoxicology fires floods human impacts landslides liquefaction mining hazards natural contaminants pollution social sciences storms tsunamis volcanic activity DF: Potential dangers from both natural processes (e.g., earthquakes, floods, and climate change) and human impacts on the environment.
TNR: 183 health (human) USE: environmental health (human) TNR: 734 health and disease UF: disease BT: topics NT: disease vectors environmental health (human) RT: bacteriology endocrinology
78
histology immunology life sciences parasitology pathology social sciences SN: Covers both human and non-human health and disease topics.
For human health and disease, use the narrower term 'environmental health (human)'.
TNR: 597 heat flow (Earth) UF: geothermics heatflow (Earth) BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geophysics DF: Conductive heat flow through the surface of the Earth.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 866 heatflow (Earth) USE: heat flow (Earth) TNR: 98 herbicide contaminants USE: pesticide and herbicide contamination TNR: 944 herbivores BT: consumers (organisms) RT: ecology zoology DF: Animals that feed chiefly on plants.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 501 heredity USE: genetics TNR: 48 herpetology BT: vertebrate zoology RT: amphibians reptiles DF: Scientific study of reptiles and amphibians.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 193 histology BT: anatomy and physiology RT: health and disease DF: a) Anatomical study of the microscopic structure of animal and plant tissues.
b) Microscopic structure of tissue.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 199
79
historic time period BT: time periods SN: This term should be used to indicate that the item has an historic time period associated with it, where that is a significant factor about the item.
Also give a range of dates of coverage where this is known.
DF: Period of time extending from the beginning of written history to the present.
TNR: 946 horizontal datums USE: map coordinate systems TNR: 947 horseshoe crabs BT: arthropods RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Horseshoe crabs belong to a separate class, called Merostomata, of the phylum of Arthropods.
Though they are called "crabs," they are, in fact, an ancient species that is most closely related to trilobytes that existed 544 million years ago.
[Adapted from 
TNR: 736 human health USE: environmental health (human) TNR: 735 human impacts BT: topics NT: land use change mining hazards overfishing overgrazing pollution waste treatment and disposal RT: acid deposition ecology
80
ecotoxicology environmental health (human) fires hazards invasive species land subsidence social sciences DF: Anthropogenic stress (or stress caused by human activity) on the natural environment.
[EPA: Global Warming: Fundamentals 
b) A wind with a speed greater than 74 miles (119 kilometers) per hour, according to the Beaufort scale.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 551 hydraulic engineering UF: hydraulics UF+: hydraulic models BT: engineering sciences RT: agricultural water use commercial water use domestic water use industrial water use instream water use irrigation water use mining water use offstream water use power generation water use wastewater use water use DF: Branch of engineering using the physical science and technology of the static and dynamic behavior of fluids.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 727 hydraulic models US+: hydraulic engineering models TNR: 954 hydraulics USE: hydraulic engineering TNR: 955
81
hydroelectric power generation water use USE: power generation water use TNR: 956 hydrogeology UF: geohydrology groundwater geology UF+: hydrographic sections BT: geology RT: geothermal resources groundwater groundwater flow hydrothermal processes renewable energy resources water resources DF: Science that deals with subsurface waters and with related geologic aspects of surface waters.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 857 hydrographic datasets BT: datasets RT: geospatial datasets TNR: 9 hydrographic sections US+: cross sections hydrogeology TNR: 538 hydrologic maps US+: hydrology maps and atlases TNR: 957 hydrologic processes USE: geologic and hydrologic processes TNR: 862 hydrologic unit codes BT: terminologies and classifications TNR: 958 hydrology UF+: hydrologic maps BT: Earth sciences RT: agricultural water use commercial water use domestic water use erosion floods geologic and hydrologic processes groundwater quality hydrothermal processes industrial water use
82
instream water use irrigation water use limnology marine water quality meteorology mining water use nutrient content (water) ocean sciences offstream water use oxygen content (water) power generation water use precipitation (atmospheric) river discharge river reaches river systems salinity sediment transport streamflow streamflow monitoring surface water (non-marine) surface water quality suspended material (water) wastewater use water circulation water hardness water pH water properties water quality water resources water sampling water temperature water use wetland functions DF: Science that deals with global water (both liquid and solid), its properties, circulation, and distribution, on and under the Earth's surface and in the atmosphere, from the moment of its precipitation until it is returned to the atmosphere through evapotranspiration or is discharged into the ocean.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
In practice, the study of the oceans is considered to be ocean sciences (oceanography) and the study of the atmosphere is considered to be meteorology.
[USGS Water-Supply Paper 1541-A, 1995] TNR: 652 hydrosphere USE: water resources TNR: 960 hydrothermal processes BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: hydrogeology hydrology DF: Those processes associated with igneous activity that involve heated or superheated water, esp. alteration, space filling, and replacement.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
83
TNR:
867
hyperspectral imaging BT: remote sensing RT: geography DF: Type of multispectral imaging that records many tens of bands of imagery at very narrow bandwidths.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 961 hypoxia USE: oxygen content (water) TNR: 962 hysteresis USE: magnetic hysteresis analysis TNR: 15 ice USE: TNR: snow and ice cover 964
ice core sampling US+: drilling and coring snow and ice cover TNR: 531 ice storms BT: storms DF: Storms in which snow or rain freezes on contact, forming a coat of ice on the surfaces it touches.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th. ed] TNR: 87 ichnofossils UF: trace fossils BT: fossils RT: biostratigraphy paleontology DF: Sedimentary structures consisting of a fossilized track, resulting from the life activities (other than growth) of an animal, such as a mark made by an invertebrate moving or resting on or in soft sediment.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 820 ichthyology BT: vertebrate zoology RT: commercial fishery resources fish fishery resources inland fishery resources marine fishery resources overfishing recreational fishery resources
84
DF: Scientific study of fish.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 794 IFSAR UF: BT: RT: TNR: Interferometric Synthetic Aperture Radar (IFSAR) remote sensing geography 965
igneous rocks BT: rocks and deposits RT: petrology DF: Rocks that solidified from molten or partly molten material, i.e. from a magma.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 966 illustrations USE: graphics TNR: 910 image analysis BT: computational methods RT: geography geospatial analysis spatial analysis DF: Pattern analysis of the shapes and textures of images to identify features and derive information about them.
TNR: 489 images UF: UF+: pictures aerial photographs aerial photos air photos AVHRR images Landsat images LIDAR images orthoimagery orthophotographs photographs remote-sensing data remote-sensing images scientists-at-work photographs object types audiovisual materials graphics 166
BT: RT: TNR:
immunology BT: anatomy and physiology RT: health and disease
85
DF: Study of the body's resistance to invasion by other organisms (i.e., immunity, the immune system, and the interaction of antigens with antibodies).
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 200 in-stream water use USE: instream water use TNR: 973 indexes USE: catalogs and indexes TNR: 425 indigenous species USE: native species TNR: 975 industrial minerals USE: mineral resources TNR: 976 industrial water use BT: offstream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Use of water for industrial purposes such as fabrication, processing, washing, and cooling, and includes such industries as steel, chemical and allied products, paper and allied products, mining, and petroleum refining.
[USGS Glossary of water-use terminology, 
TNR: 558 information sciences BT: sciences NT: biological informatics computer science RT: geographic information systems (GIS) information system design and development
86
metadata development scientific careers DF: Sciences concerned with the gathering, manipulation, classification, storage, and retrieval of recorded knowledge.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 338 information services (USGS) USE: USGS information services TNR: 981 information system design and development BT: topics NT: geographic information systems (GIS) metadata development RT: information sciences SN: Use for the design and development of information systems.
Do not use for the general case where information systems are part of the activity.
TNR: 853 infrared imaging BT: remote sensing NT: AVHRR RT: geography DF: Producing images using the thermal infrared spectral band.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 287 inland fishery resources BT: fishery resources RT: aquatic biology ichthyology DF: The stock of fisheries located in inland water bodies, including lakes, ponds, streams, rivers, natural or artificial watercourses and reservoirs, and coastal lagoons and artificial water bodies.
[Adapted from FAO Glossary, 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 526 insects BT: arthropods NT: butterflies and moths RT: entomology
87
DF: Any of numerous usually small arthropod animals of the class Insecta, having an adult stage characterized by three pairs of legs and a body segmented into head, thorax, and abdomen and usually having two pairs of wings.
Insects include flies, crickets, mosquitoes, beetles, butterflies, and bees.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 249 instream water use UF: in-stream water use BT: water use NT: power generation water use wastewater use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Water that is used, but not withdrawn, from a surface or groundwater source.
[USGS 
TNR: 728 interactive map servers (USGS) USE: USGS map servers TNR: 985 interagency programs (USGS) USE: USGS interagency programs TNR: 987 Interferometric Synthetic Aperture Radar (IFSAR) USE: IFSAR TNR: 41 international programs (USGS) USE: USGS international programs TNR: 989 internships (USGS) USE: USGS internships TNR: 991 introduced species USE: nonindigenous species TNR: 993
88
invader species USE: invasive species TNR: 994 invasive species UF: invader species UF+: biological invasions BT: nonindigenous species RT: biodiversity ecology human impacts life sciences DF: Those plants, animals, and microbes not native to a region which, when introduced either accidentally or intentionally, out-compete native species for available resources, reproduce prolifically, and dominate regions and ecosystems.
[National Agricultural Library 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 995 invertebrate zoology BT: zoology NT: entomology RT: arachnids arthropods bryozoans and brachiopods coelenterates crustaceans echinoderms flatworms horseshoe crabs invertebrate paleontology invertebrates mollusks ostracodes roundworms segmented worms shellfish sponges
89
worms DF: Branch of biology that deals with animals, such as insects and mollusks, that lack backbones or spinal columns.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 730 invertebrates BT: animals NT: arthropods bryozoans and brachiopods coelenterates conodonts echinoderms mollusks sponges worms RT: invertebrate paleontology invertebrate zoology DF: Animals without a backbone, such as the mollusks, arthropods, and coelenterates.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 207 irrigation water use BT: agricultural water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Provision of water to artificially sustain the growth of plants.
[Adapted from Dic. of Cultural Literacy, 2nd ed.] TNR: 160 isostasy BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geophysics glaciology DF: Condition of equilibrium, comparable to floating, of the units of the lithosphere above the asthenosphere.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 868 isotopic analysis BT: laboratory methods NT: light stable isotope analysis radiometric dating RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Experimental determination of the proportion of a given isotope (or isotopes) in a sample.
TNR: 998 jellyfish USE: coelenterates TNR: 471 jointing (geologic) USE: fracture (geologic)
90
TNR:
822
journal articles USE: documents TNR: 605 journals USE: documents TNR: 606 K-12 programs (USGS) USE: USGS K-12 programs TNR: 999 keystone species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) DF: Species that have a greater effect on their ecosystems and associated ecological processes than would otherwise be predicted from their relative abundance or biomass alone.
This group includes species known as 'ecological engineers,' such as the gopher tortoise and the beaver, whose activities alter the habitat and, in doing so, modify the fates and opportunities of other species in that ecosystem.
[Adapted from Ecological Principles and Guidelines for Managing the Use of Land, 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1001 La Nina USE: ocean-atmosphere interaction TNR: 1002 laboratories (USGS) USE: USGS laboratories TNR: 1003 laboratory methods BT: methods NT: chemical analysis core analysis culturing (specimens) faunal and floral census fission-track dating grain-size analysis isotopic analysis meristics microscopy paleomagnetic analysis petrography
91
TNR:
plant and animal testing therapeutic methods tree ring analysis 433
laboratory-induced magnetization analysis BT: paleomagnetic analysis RT: geophysics DF: Analysis of the magnetic field spontaneously induced in the laboratory in a volume of rock by the uniform action of an applied field.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1009 lake circulation UF: circulation (lake) BT: water circulation RT: limnology DF: The complete mixing of a lake or sea; generally it occurs when the waters are isothermal, often at the temperature of maximum density, [Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 948 land subsidence maps US+: land subsidence maps and atlases TNR: 1010 land surface characteristics BT: Earth characteristics RT: geography geomorphology sea floor characteristics DF: Specifiable, definable or recognizable attributes of the land surface.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 637
92
land surveying UF: surveying BT: geolocation measurement RT: geodesy geography DF: The measurement of dimensional relationships, as of horizontal distances, elevations, directions, and angles, on the earth's surface especially for use in locating property boundaries, construction layout, and mapmaking.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 847 land use and land cover BT: topics RT: land use classifications DF: The vegetation, water, natural surface, and cultural features on the land surface.
[USGS Land Use and Land Cover (LULC) Data, 
TNR: 570 land use characteristics USE: land use classifications TNR: 1012 land use classifications UF: land use characteristics UF+: land use maps BT: terminologies and classifications RT: land use and land cover SN: For the Anderson land-use and land-cover classification system, 1976, see 
TNR: 1013 land use maps US+: land use classifications maps and atlases TNR: 1014 Landforms BT: land surface characteristics RT: geomorphology Landsat images US+: images
93
TNR:
multispectral imaging 967
landslide inventory maps US+: landslides maps and atlases TNR: 1016 landslide maps US+: landslides maps and atlases TNR: 1017 landslide preparedness US+: hazard preparedness landslides TNR: 57 landslide susceptibility assessment UF: slope stability UF+: landslide susceptibility maps slope stability maps BT: risk assessment RT: landslides DF: Estimation of the probability of occurrence and likely severity of landslides in a given area.
TNR: 1018 landslide susceptibility maps US+: landslide susceptibility assessment maps and atlases TNR: 1019 landslides UF: mudflows slides (land) UF+: landslide inventory maps landslide maps landslide preparedness BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geomorphology hazards landslide susceptibility assessment DF: General term covering a wide variety of mass-movement landforms and processes involving the downslope transport, under gravitational influence, of soil and rock material en masse.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 869 leaching (analytical method) USE: chemical analysis TNR: 1337 learning web USE: educational materials
94
TNR:
698
legal land descriptions USE: cadastral and legal land descriptions TNR: 400 lepidoptera USE: butterflies and moths TNR: 396 lesson plans USE: educational materials TNR: 699 lexicons USE: glossaries TNR: 903 libraries (USGS) USE: USGS libraries and archives TNR: 1023 lichens BT: organisms RT: mycology phycology DF: Thallophytic plant of the subdivision Lichenes that is composed of a fungus and an alga living in symbiotic relationship.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
LIDAR works by transmitting laser signals using all light ranges (ultraviolet, visible, infrared) and amplifying the light that is scattered back through an optical telescope and photomultiplier tube.
[Computer Desktop Encyclopedia, 2001] TNR: 1025 LIDAR images US+: images LIDAR TNR: 1027 life sciences UF: biological sciences biology BT: sciences NT: anatomy and physiology aquatic biology
95
biochemistry botany cell biology developmental biology ecology ecotoxicology genetics marine biology microbiology molecular biology morphology (biological) mycology parasitology pathology systematics and taxonomy zoology RT: biodiversity biological informatics biological productivity biota decomposers disease vectors dispersal (organisms) endangered species endemic species extinction and extirpation health and disease invasive species migration (organisms) native species natural resources nonindigenous species organism groupings (non-taxonomic) organisms paleontology plant and animal tagging renewable energy resources renewable resources scientific careers sexing (plants 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 196 life-long learning programs (USGS) USE: USGS lifelong learning programs TNR: 1028 lifelong learning programs (USGS) USE: USGS lifelong learning programs TNR: 1029 LIght Detection and Ranging (LIDAR) USE: LIDAR
96
TNR:
1026
light stable isotope analysis UF: light stable-isotope analysis BT: isotopic analysis NT: beryllium isotope analysis carbon isotope analysis oxygen isotope analysis tritium analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Analysis applying stable (O, C, H and S) isotope geochemistry to the origin of rocks and ore deposits and to selected problems in other scientific endeavors of Earth Science.
[Natural Resources Canada, 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 461 limnology BT: Earth sciences RT: aquatic ecosystems bathymetry benthic ecosystems CTD measurement eutrophication freshwater ecosystems hydrology lake circulation surface water (non-marine) surface water quality water resources DF: Study of the physical, chemical, meteorological, biological, and ecological characteristics and interactions of all inland waters, such as pools, streams, bogs, ponds, lakes, rivers, and wetlands.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 959 lineament maps US+: lineation (geologic) maps and atlases TNR: 1033 lineaments USE: lineation (geologic) TNR: 1034
97
lineation (geologic) UF: lineaments UF+: lineament maps BT: geologic structure RT: structural geology tectonic processes DF: General, nongeneric term for a locally linear structure or fabric in a rock, e.g. flow lines, scratches, striae, slickensides or slickenfibers on a single surface; linear arrangements of components in sediments; or axes of folds.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 881 liquefaction BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: engineering geology hazards DF: a) Transformation of loosely packed sediment into a fluid mass preliminary to movement of a turbidity current by subaqueous slumping or sliding or in situ. b) In cohesionless soil, the transformation from a solid to a liquid state as a result of increased pore pressure and reduced effective stress.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 870 liquid chromatography BT: chromatography RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Process for separating components in a liquid phase from one another by passing them over a solid or liquid stationary phase where the components are separated by their differential mobility rates.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 440 lists of publications USE: catalogs and indexes TNR: 426 lithification USE: geologic and hydrologic processes TNR: 863 lithologic maps US+: maps and atlases rocks and deposits TNR: 1035 lithology USE: rocks and deposits TNR: 1036 lithosphere BT: crust (Earth) NT: continental lithosphere
98
oceanic lithosphere mantle (Earth) rocks and deposits tectonophysics DF: Solid portion of the Earth, as compared with the atmosphere and the hydrosphere; it includes the crust and part of the upper mantle.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 507 RT: lithostratigraphy BT: geologic history RT: stratigraphy DF: Element of stratigraphy that deals with the description and systematic organization of the rocks of the Earth's crust into distinctive named units based on the lithologic character of the rocks and their stratigraphic relations.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 877 liverworts and hornworts BT: nonvascular plants RT: botany mosses DF: Simple green land plants with leaves and a stem and always without roots.
They are members of the phyla Bryophyta, along with mosses.
TNR: 1038 livestock water use USE: agricultural water use TNR: 158 location measurement USE: geolocation measurement TNR: 858 long-term ecological monitoring BT: ecosystem monitoring RT: ecology DF: Investigating ecological processes over long temporal and broad spatial scales.
[US Long Term Ecological Research Network, 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1041 magnetic anomaly maps US+: magnetic field (Earth) maps and atlases TNR: 1042
99
magnetic disk BT: digital format TNR: 583 magnetic field USE: magnetic field (Earth) TNR: 1043 magnetic field (Earth) UF: geomagnetic field geomagnetics geomagnetism magnetic field magnetosphere UF+: magnetic anomaly maps BT: Earth characteristics RT: geophysics DF: The magnetic field that surrounds the Earth which acts like a great spherical magnet.
This magnetic field resembles, in general, the field generated by a dipole magnet located at the center of the Earth.
[Adapted from NESDIS National Geophysical Data Center, 
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 963 magnetic surveying USE: aeromagnetic surveying electromagnetic surveying TNR: 152 magnetic susceptibility analysis BT: paleomagnetic analysis RT: geophysics DF: Analysis using the ratio of the electric polarization to the electric intensity in a polarized dialectic.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1045 magnetic tape BT: digital format TNR: 584 magnetosphere USE: magnetic field (Earth) TNR: 1044 magnetotelluric sounding USE: electromagnetic surveying
100
TNR:
1343
malacology USE: zoology TNR: 1046 mammalogy BT: vertebrate zoology RT: mammals DF: Scientific study of mammals.
[Merriam-Webster Online Collegiate Dic. 
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1048 managed fires USE: controlled fires TNR: 75 managed flooding USE: controlled flooding TNR: 74 management methods BT: methods NT: decision support methods environmental assessment hazard preparedness information management methods natural resource management risk assessment TNR: 342 mantle (Earth) BT: Earth structure NT: asthenosphere RT: geophysics lithosphere DF: Zone of the Earth below the crust and above the core, which is divided into the upper mantle and the lower mantle, with a transition zone in between.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 656 manuals UF: technical instructions user guides BT: documents
101
TNR:
622
map coordinate systems UF: coordinate systems geographic coordinate systems grid coordinate systems horizontal datums map projections vertical datums BT: topics RT: cartography geographic information systems (GIS) geography DF: Numeric methods of representing locations on the earth's surface on maps.
[Adapted from Mathematics of Cartography: Mathematics Topics-Coordinate System, 
102
BT: RT: TNR:
earthquake epicenter maps earthquake occurrence maps engineering geology maps geochemical anomaly maps geologic maps geophysical maps geotechnical properties maps gravity anomaly maps ground motion maps hydrologic maps land subsidence maps land use maps landslide inventory maps landslide maps landslide susceptibility maps lineament maps lithologic maps magnetic anomaly maps paleotectonic maps quadrangle maps relief maps rock mechanics maps seismic hazard maps seismic reflection survey maps seismicity distribution maps shaking maps (seismic) slope stability maps species distribution maps subsurface maps surficial geologic maps tectonic maps thickness maps topographic maps object types cartography geographic names and classifications quadrangle names 151
maps on demand (USGS) USE: USGS maps on demand TNR: 1067 marine biology UF: biological oceanography BT: life sciences RT: aquatic biology aquatic ecosystems benthic ecosystems commercial fishery resources fishery resources marine ecosystems marine fishery resources migratory species
103
DF: TNR:
ocean sciences recreational fishery resources reef ecosystems whaling Study of marine fauna and flora.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] 231
marine chemistry UF: chemical oceanography ocean chemistry water properties (marine) BT: water chemistry RT: CTD measurement marine water quality ocean characteristics ocean salinity ocean sciences DF: Study of the ocean that deals with the composition, structure, properties, and reactions of matter, especially of atomic and molecular systems.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 844 marine ecosystems BT: aquatic ecosystems NT: reef ecosystems RT: aquatic biology ecology marine biology DF: Ecological communities living entirely or primarily in or on seawater.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 238 marine fishery resources UF: coastal fisheries coastal fishing deep sea fisheries deep sea fishing reef fisheries reef fishing BT: fishery resources NT: whaling RT: aquatic biology commercial fishery resources ichthyology marine biology reef ecosystems DF: The stock of fisheries located in seas and oceans.
TNR: 467 marine geology UF: geological oceanography BT: geology RT: marine geophysics
104
ocean sciences sea floor characteristics side-scan sonar methods DF: Study of the ocean that deals with the ocean floor and the oceancontinent border.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 886 marine geophysics BT: geophysics RT: marine geology ocean characteristics ocean processes ocean sciences side-scan sonar methods DF: Study of the ocean by quantitative physical methods.
[Adapted from [Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 895 marine water quality UF: ocean water quality BT: water quality RT: hydrology marine chemistry ocean sciences DF: Observed intrinsic characteristics of marine waters affecting their ability to support life or facilitate biological processes such as waste decomposition.
TNR: 1071 marsh ecosystems USE: wetland ecosystems TNR: 1073 marshland ecosystems USE: wetland ecosystems TNR: 1074 mass spectroscopy BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Observation, recording, and measuring of a pattern of relative abundances of ions of different atomic or molecular mass within a sample.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 435 mathematical methods USE: computational methods TNR: 487 mathematical modeling UF: modeling (mathematical) numerical methods UF+: groundwater flow modeling
105
streamflow modeling computational methods mathematical simulation mathematical models spatial analysis DF: Creating mathematical expressions to represent a simplified view of real-world systems.
TNR: 490 BT: NT: RT: mathematical models UF: mathematical simulations BT: models RT: mathematical modeling mathematical simulation TNR: 1077 mathematical simulation BT: mathematical modeling RT: mathematical models DF: Representing a physical system by computer algorithms or models that imitate the behavior of the system; a simplified version of a situation in the real world.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1076 mathematical simulations USE: mathematical models TNR: 91 media relations (USGS) USE: USGS media relations TNR: 1078 meetings (USGS) USE: USGS meetings TNR: 1080 memos USE: TNR: documents 607
mercury contamination BT: anthropogenic contamination RT: biochemistry ecology ecotoxicology DF: Biological disturbances caused by mercury compounds that have entered the environment.
TNR: 221 meristics UF: morphometrics BT: laboratory methods RT: morphology (biological) systematics and taxonomy
106
DF: Method of determining the taxonomy of animals by counting and measuring body parts; can be used to distinguish between species which are closely related and to determine the influence of the environment on the organism [Adapted from Onedin Project, 
use for the general case where metadata are part of the activity.
TNR: 982
Do not
metallic ores UF: ore deposits (metallic) BT: mineral resources NT: gold ores RT: economic geology mineralogy nonmetallic resources DF: Naturally occurring materials from which metals of economic value can be profitably extracted.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 566 metamorphic rocks BT: rocks and deposits RT: metamorphism (geological) petrology DF: Any rock derived from pre-existing rocks by m
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1083 metamorphism (biological) BT: organism growth and development DF: Process involving marked or abrupt reorganization of an animal during post-embryonic development, such as the transformation of a larva into a succeeding stage of development and growth.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 11 metamorphism (geological) BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: geochemistry geology geophysics metamorphic rocks
107
DF: Process by which rocks are altered in composition, texture, or internal structure by extreme heat, pressure, and the introduction of new chemical substances.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 871 meteor impacts US+: hazards meteorites TNR: 941 meteorite impacts US+: hazards meteorites TNR: 942 meteorites UF: bolides meteors UF+: bolide impacts meteor impacts meteorite impacts BT: planetary bodies SN: Use this term for 'meteors' as well as 'meteorites' since these terms are often interchanged without regard to the formal definitions.
USGS is more likely to have information about 'meteorites' since these are objects found on the Earth.
DF: Meteorites are meteoroids (small objects in outer space) that make it all the way through the atmosphere and hit the Earth.
[Santa Barbara News Press, D3, 012902] TNR: 376 meteorology BT: atmospheric sciences RT: atmospheric and climatic processes climatology hurricanes hydrology ocean currents ocean sciences planetary sciences storms tornadoes DF: Systematic study of short-term--that is, day-to-day variations in temperature, humidity, air pressure, wind, cloud cover, and precipitation, along with their causes.
It provides the basis for weather forecasting.
Meteorology is closely related to, but distinct from, climatology, which deals with weather conditions in a given area over an extended period of time (from a month to many millions of years).
[Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 269 meteors USE: meteorites TNR: 1084
108
methane resources (coalbed) USE: coalbed methane resources TNR: 464 methods NT: computational methods field methods laboratory methods management methods photography remote sensing videography SN: The methods facet represents the research, management, and data collection methods used by the USGS.
TNR: 488 microbiology BT: life sciences NT: bacteriology virology RT: archaea bacteria culturing (specimens) faunal and floral census plankton producers (organisms) protists DF: Branch of biology that deals with microorganisms and their effects on other living organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 290 microfiche BT: non-digital format TNR: 1087 microfilm BT: non-digital format TNR: 1088 micropaleontology BT: paleontology RT: calcareous nannoplankton conodonts diatoms dinoflagellates faunal and floral census fossils protists DF: Branch of paleontology that deals with the study of fossils too small to be observed without the aid of a microscope; the study of microfossils.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 821
109
microscope methods USE: microscopy TNR: 1089 microscopy UF: microscope methods BT: laboratory methods NT: electron microscopy optical microscopy RT: faunal and floral census DF: Laboratory methods using microscopes, instruments that produce enlarged images of small objects.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 709 microtomy BT: optical microscopy DF: Preparation of specimens with a microtome, an instrument used to cut a specimen into thin sections for microscopic examination.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1091 microwave imaging BT: remote sensing NT: SMMR SSM/I RT: geography radar imaging DF: Passive remote sensing methods utilizing energy naturally reflected or radiated from the terrain in the approximate wavelength range from 1 mm to beyond 1 m. Active remote sensing is radar imaging.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1092 migration (organisms) UF: seasonal migration UF+: biological invasions BT: ecological processes RT: animal behavior biogeography dispersal (organisms) ecology life sciences migratory species DF: Seasonal movement, or movement in response to environmental change, of populations of animals to more favorable environments.
[Adapted from Dic. of Biology, Oxford Univ.
Press, 2000] TNR: 203 migratory species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: animal behavior aquatic biology biogeography
110
ecology marine biology migration (organisms) zoology DF: Species changing location periodically, especially by moving seasonally from one region to another.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 17 mineral resources UF: industrial minerals minerals BT: nonrenewable resources NT: metallic ores nonmetallic resources RT: economic geology mineralogy DF: Mass of naturally occurring mineral material, e.g. metal ores or nonmetallic minerals, usually of economic value, without regard to mode of origin.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 977 mineralogical analysis USE: chemical analysis TNR: 1339 mineralogy UF: gemology BT: geology RT: gem resources gold ores metallic ores mineral resources x-ray diffraction DF: Study of minerals: formation, occurrence, properties, composition and classification.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 841 minerals USE: mineral resources TNR: 1095 mining and quarrying UF: quarrying BT: natural resource extraction DF: Extracting metallic or nonmetallic mineral deposits (mining) from the Earth and building stone or other valuable nonmetallic constituent from a surficial mine (quarrying).
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1096 mining hazards BT: human impacts RT: engineering sciences hazards
111
social sciences waste treatment and disposal DF: Damage resulting from mining, such as roof falls, fires and explosions, coal and rock waste, surface erosion, and contamination of the watershed, threatening human health and local ecosystems.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 943 mining water use BT: offstream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Water use for the extraction of minerals occurring naturally, including solids, such as coal and ores; liquids, such as crude petroleum; and gases, such as natural gas.
[USGS Glossary of water-use terminology, 
molecular biology BT: life sciences RT: cell biology genetics organism growth and development DF: Study of the chemical structures and processes of biological phenomena at the molecular level.
<
112
DF: Solitary invertebrates belonging to the phylum Mollusca, characterized by a nonsegmented body that is bilaterally symmetrical and by a radially or biradially symmetrical mantle and shell.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 996 morphology (biological) BT: life sciences RT: meristics DF: a) Branch of biology that deals with the form and structure of animals and plants or their fossil remains; especially a study of the forms, relations, and phylogenetic development of organs apart from their functions.
b) Features included in the form and structure of an organism or any of its parts.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 353 morphometrics USE: meristics TNR: 42 mosses BT: RT: nonvascular plants botany liverworts and hornworts DF: Simple green land plants with leaves and a stem and always without roots.
They are members of the phyla Bryophyta, along with liverworts and hornworts.
TNR: 1040 moths USE: TNR: butterflies and moths 397
motion pictures USE: audiovisual materials TNR: 282 movies USE: TNR: audiovisual materials 283
mudflows USE: landslides TNR: 1022 multispectral imaging UF: thematic mapper UF+: Landsat images BT: remote sensing RT: geography DF: Acquiring optical images in more than one spectral band of the same physical area and in the same scale.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1015
113
multivariate statistical analysis BT: statistical analysis DF: Methods of statistical analysis that consider the simultaneous variation in two or more variables.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1101 mycology BT: life sciences RT: botany fungi lichens DF: Branch of life sciences that deals with fungi.
[Adapted from MerriamWebster's Medical Dictionary, network ed., 1997] TNR: 354 native species UF: indigenous species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) NT: endemic species RT: biodiversity ecology life sciences nonindigenous species DF: Species of animals or plants that originated in a particular place or region.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 318 natural contaminants UF: contaminants (natural) environmental pollutants BT: topics NT: toxic radionuclides (natural) toxic trace elements (natural) RT: anthropogenic contamination ecotoxicology hazards pollution DF: Pollutants from natural sources.
TNR: 223 natural UF: BT: NT: gas resources petroleum resources (gas) nonrenewable energy resources coalbed methane resources gas hydrate resources RT: economic geology DF: a) Resources of hydrocarbons that exist as a gas or vapor at ordinary pressures and temperatures.
b) Gaseous hydrocarbons trapped in the zone of ground-water saturation, under pressure from, and partially dissolved in, underlying water or petroleum [Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 465
114
natural remanent magnetization analysis UF: natural remnant magnetization analysis BT: paleomagnetic analysis RT: geophysics DF: Method of determining the age and deformation history of rocks using the fixed direction of the rock's magnetization in situ to indicate the relative positions of the geomagnetic poles for spatial reference.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed. and USGS Paleomagnetism Analysis 
TNR: 1049 natural resource exploration UF: dowsing exploration prospecting UF+: exploration seismology seismic exploration BT: topics DF: Search for deposits of useful minerals or fossil fuels, using geologic reconnaissance and both surface and underground investigations.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 629 natural UF: BT: NT: DF: TNR: resource extraction resource extraction topics mining and quarrying well drilling Removal of natural materials or properties (such as heat) for use.
632
natural resource management UF: conservation environmental management environmental planning resource conservation resource restoration BT: management methods NT: biological population management controlled fires controlled flooding ecosystem management natural resource assessment
115
remediation water resource management watershed management RT: ecosystem monitoring natural resources population and community ecology DF: Managing natural resources for sustainability and ecosystem health.
[Adapted from Smith 
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 691 navigating USE: geolocation measurement TNR: 859 nekton BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) DF: Collection of marine and freshwater organisms that can swim freely and are generally independent of currents, ranging in size from microscopic organisms to whales.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 116 nematodes USE: roundworms TNR: 1111 neotectonic processes UF: neotectonics BT: tectonic processes RT: earthquake probabilities structural geology tectonophysics DF: Tectonic processes associated with post-Miocene structures and structural history of the Earth's crust.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 677 neotectonics USE: neotectonic processes TNR: 1113
116
neutron activation analysis BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Activiation analysis that identifies elements in a sample by irradiating the sample with neutrons inside a nuclear reactor in order to identify elements by their characteristic radiations.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 436 new mapping projects (USGS) USE: USGS news TNR: 1114 new projects (USGS) USE: USGS news TNR: 1116 news (USGS) USE: USGS news TNR: 1117 news releases UF: press releases BT: object types TNR: 1118 newsletters USE: documents TNR: 608 nitrogen content USE: nutrient content (water) TNR: 1120 non-digital format UF: analog format nondigital format BT: physical formats NT: audio tape film microfiche microfilm paper (material) slides (photographic) video tape TNR: 281 non-formal education (USGS) USE: USGS lifelong learning programs TNR: 1126 non-indigenous species
117
USE: TNR:
nonindigenous species 1127
non-native species USE: nonindigenous species TNR: 1128 non-renewable resources USE: nonrenewable resources TNR: 1129 non-vascular plants USE: nonvascular plants TNR: 68 nondigital format USE: non-digital format TNR: 1122 nonindigenous species UF: alien species exotic species foreign species introduced species non-indigenous species non-native species BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) NT: invasive species RT: biodiversity ecology life sciences native species DF: Species not originating, growing, or produced in a certain place or region; not indigenous: [Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 187 nonmetallic resources UF: ore deposits (non-metallic) BT: mineral resources NT: building stone resources gem resources RT: clay deposits economic geology gravel deposits metallic ores sand deposits DF: In economic geology, any rock or mineral mined for its nonmetallic value, such as stone, sulfur, gems, or salt.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 390 nonrenewable energy resources UF
118
coal resources natural gas resources oil resources RT: economic geology DF: Natural resources that are used for heat and power generation, including oil and natural gas, and coal, that are considered nonrenewable because of the millions of years needed to form fossil fuels.
TNR: 463 nonrenewable resources UF: non-renewable resources BT: natural resources NT: mineral resources nonrenewable energy resources soil resources RT: economic geology DF: Natural resources with economic value that are slow to form and are destroyed by use.
[Adapted from Random House College Dic., 1980] TNR: 716 nonvascular plants UF: non-vascular plants BT: plants (organisms) NT: liverworts and hornworts mosses RT: botany DF: Plants without a vascular system or well differentiated roots, stems, and leaves.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1039 nuclear reactors (USGS) USE: USGS nuclear reactors TNR: 1133 nuclear waste repositories USE: waste treatment and disposal TNR: 1135 numerical methods USE: mathematical modeling TNR: 1075 nutrient balance USE: nutrient cycling TNR: 1136 nutrient content (water) UF: nitrogen content phosphorus content BT: water properties RT: hydrology nutrient cycling water chemistry
NT:
119
DF: Occurrence in water of substances required for the maintenance or growth of organisms.
Usually applied to simple dissolved inorganic ions, but can also be applied to dissolved organic forms of nitrogen and phosphorus or to certain trace elements.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1121 nutrient cycling UF: nutrient balance BT: biogeochemical cycling NT: food web RT: biochemistry ecology nutrient content (water) DF: Processing of nutrients through a biological system.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 326 object types NT: audiovisual materials bibliographies catalogs and indexes datasets directories documents educational materials geologic time scales graphics images maps and atlases models news releases policies and regulations posters software speeches terminologies and classifications web portals SN: The 'object types' facet represents the intellectual intent of the information objects, such as the fact that an item is a 'map' or contains a 'map'.
To describe the physical format of the item, use terms from the 'physical formats' facet.
TNR: 285 observatories (USGS) USE: USGS observatories TNR: 1143 ocean characteristics UF: oceans UF+: ocean monitoring BT: Earth characteristics NT: ocean salinity ocean temperature sea floor characteristics
120
RT:
TNR:
sea-level change marine chemistry marine geophysics ocean processes ocean sciences oceanic lithosphere surface water (non-marine) water resources 79
ocean chemistry USE: marine chemistry TNR: 1145 ocean circulation UF: circulation (ocean) BT: ocean processes RT: climatology ocean currents ocean sciences tides water circulation DF: Large scale horizontal water motion within an ocean.
[McGraw Hill Dic. of Scientific and Technical Terms, 5th ed.] TNR: 1146 ocean current measurement US+: field inventory and monitoring ocean currents TNR: 765 ocean currents UF+: ocean current measurement BT: ocean processes RT: meteorology ocean circulation ocean sciences tides DF: Broadly, any current in the ocean - tidal or nontidal, permanent or seasonal, horizontal or vertical - characterized by regularity, either as a continuous stream flowing along a definable path, or less commonly of a cyclic nature.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1147 ocean monitoring US+: field inventory and monitoring ocean characteristics TNR: 766 ocean processes UF: oceans BT: biological and physical processes NT: ocean circulation ocean currents
121
RT:
TNR:
ocean waves tides marine geophysics ocean characteristics ocean sciences ocean-atmosphere interaction surface water (non-marine) 78
ocean salinity BT: ocean characteristics RT: marine chemistry ocean sciences salinity DF: Concentration of dissolved salts in seawater.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1151 ocean sciences UF: oceanography physical oceanography BT: Earth sciences NT: paleoceanography RT: bathymetry CTD measurement global change global warming hydrology marine biology marine chemistry marine geology marine geophysics marine water quality meteorology ocean characteristics ocean circulation ocean currents ocean processes ocean salinity ocean temperature ocean waves ocean-atmosphere interaction sea floor characteristics sea-level change tides tsunamis underwater photography DF: Study of the ocean, including its physical, chemical, biological and geologic aspects.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 653 ocean temperature UF: temperature (ocean) BT: ocean characteristics
122
sea surface temperature atmospheric sciences ocean sciences SN: Includes discussion and measures of both in situ and potential temperature.
DF: Distribution of heat in the oceans, including surface water, thermocline and mode waters, and deep waters.
TNR: 1152 ocean water quality USE: marine water quality TNR: 1072 ocean wave measurement US+: field inventory and monitoring ocean waves TNR: 772 ocean waves UF: water waves UF+: ocean wave measurement BT: ocean processes NT: tsunamis RT: ocean sciences DF: Oscillatory movement of water in the ocean manifested by an alternate rise and fall of a surface in or on the water.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1153 ocean-atmosphere interaction UF: El Nino La Nina BT: atmospheric and climatic processes RT: atmospheric sciences ocean processes ocean sciences DF: Interaction between the temperature of the surface layers of the oceans and the circulation of the lowest layer of the atmosphere, the troposphere.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 265 oceanic lithosphere BT: lithosphere RT: ocean characteristics sea floor characteristics tectonophysics DF: That part of the lithosphere that is consistently underlain by an asthenosphere and is below sea level.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 1037 oceanography USE: ocean sciences TNR: 8
NT: RT:
123
oceans USE: TNR:
ocean characteristics ocean processes 1149
off-stream water use USE: offstream water use TNR: 1159 offstream water use UF: off-stream water use BT: water use NT: agricultural water use commercial water use domestic water use industrial water use mining water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology DF: Offstream water use involves the withdrawal or diversion of water from a source, treatment, distribution, and use; and the collection, treatment, and return flow of wastewater.
[USGS 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 717 oil sand resources BT: oil resources RT: economic geology DF: Petroleum resources contained in porous strata such as sandstone or unconsolidated sand.
Term also applied to productive limestone and dolomite.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1161 oil shale resources BT: oil resou
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1162 omnivores BT: consumers (organisms)
124
ecology zoology DF: Animals eating both animal and vegetable foods.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 502 ontogeny USE: organism growth and development TNR: 47 open houses (USGS) USE: USGS open houses TNR: 1163 optical microscopy BT: microscopy NT: microtomy RT: petrography DF: Microscopy using visible light for illumination.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1090 oral presentations USE: speeches TNR: 1166 ordering services (USGS) USE: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 1167 ore deposits (metallic) USE: metallic ores TNR: 1082 ore deposits (non-metallic) USE: nonmetallic resources TNR: 1168 organic decomposition USE: biogeochemical cycling TNR: 324 organism groupings (non-taxonomic) BT: topics NT: biota consumers (organisms) decomposers endangered species game species keystone species macroinvertebrates migratory species native species nekton
RT:
125
nonindigenous species plankton pollinators producers (organisms) shellfish vegetation wildlife RT: life sciences organisms SN: Used for categories of living organisms that are not taxonomic and that include species from more than one taxonomic group.
TNR: 366 organism growth and development UF: ontogeny BT: topics NT: metamorphism (biological) RT: developmental biology molecular biology TNR: 46 organisms UF: biological organisms BT: topics NT: algae animals archaea bacteria fungi lichens plants (organisms) protists viruses RT: life sciences organism groupings (non-taxonomic) DF: Individual form of life, such as a plant, animal, bacterium, protist, or fungus; a body made up of organs, organelles, or other parts that work together to carry on the various processes of life.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 172 orienteering USE: geolocation measurement TNR: 860 ornithology BT: vertebrate zoology RT: birds pollinators DF: Scientific study of birds.
[Merriam-Webster Online Collegiate Dic. 
126
US+: TNR:
aerial photography images 145
orthophotographs US+: aerial photography images TNR: 146 ostracodes BT: crustaceans RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Aquatic crustaceans belonging to the subclass Ostracoda, characterized by a bivalve, generally calcified carapace with a hinge along the dorsal margin.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 539 outer core (Earth) BT: core (Earth) RT: geophysics DF: Outer or upper zone of the Earth's core, extending from a depth of 2900 km to 5100 km, and including the transition zone.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 527 over-fishing USE: overfishing TNR: 99 over-grazing USE: overgrazing TNR: 100 overfishing UF: over-fishing BT: human impacts RT: fishery resources ichthyology social sciences wildlife biology DF: Fishing (a body of water) to such a degree as to upset the ecological balance or cause depletion of fish.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 797 overgrazing UF: over-grazing BT: human impacts TNR: 72 oxygen content (water) UF: anoxia dissolved oxygen hypoxia
127
BT: RT: TNR:
water properties eutrophication hydrology water chemistry 214
oxygen isotope analysis BT: light stable isotope analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Experimental determination of the proportion of a given stable oxygen isotope in a sample.
TNR: 1031 ozone layer UF: ozonesphere BT: atmospheric composition RT: atmospheric sciences greenhouse gases DF: Region of the upper atmosphere, between about 15 and 30 kilometers (10 and 20 miles) in altitude, containing a relatively high concentration of ozone that absorbs solar ultraviolet radiation in a wavelength range not screened by other atmospheric components.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 272 ozonesphere USE: ozone layer TNR: 1174 paleobotany BT: paleontology RT: botany palynology DF: Study of plant life of the geologic past.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 384 paleoceanography BT: ocean sciences RT: paleontology DF: Study of the physical, chemical, biologic, and geologic aspects of past oceans, as deduced from the geologic record.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1158 paleomagnetic analysis BT: laboratory methods NT: Curie temperature analysis laboratory-induced magnetization analysis magnetic hysteresis analysis magnetic susceptibility analysis natural remanent magnetization analysis RT: geophysics
128
DF: Determination of the intensity and direction of the Earth's magnetic field in the geologic past using the natural remanent magnetization of Earth materials.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 546 paleontology UF: paleozoology phylogeny taphonomy BT: Earth sciences NT: invertebrate paleontology micropaleontology paleobotany vertebrate paleontology RT: biostratigraphy fossils geologic history ichnofossils life sciences paleoceanography DF: Study of life in past geologic time, based on fossil plants and animals and including phylogeny, their relationships to existing plants, animals and environments, and the chronology of the Earth's history.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 654 paleoseismology BT: seismology RT: geologic history DF: The science of identifying, characterizing and dating past earthquakes in the geological record and the internal structure of fault zones.
[Adapted from 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 383 pamphlets, brochures, and booklets USE: documents
129
TNR:
609
panchromatic imaging BT: remote sensing RT: geography DF: Capture of images by an optical imaging system sensitive to a single channel of radiation within a broadband wavelength.
[Adapted from Interpretation of Optical Images: Virtual Science Center, 
TNR: 1123 paper models USE: educational materials TNR: 700 papers (publications) USE: documents TNR: 30 parasitology BT: life sciences RT: health and disease wildlife biology DF: Study of organisms that grow, feed, and are sheltered on or in a different organism while contributing nothing to the survival of its host.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 355 particle-beam spectroscopy BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry DF: Spectroscopy using beams of atoms or subatomic particles that have been accelerated by a particle accelerating device, aimed by magnets, and focused by a lens.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 437 particle-size analysis USE: grain-size analysis TNR: 907 partnerships (USGS) USE: USGS partnerships TNR: 1181 patho
130
pathology UF: pathobiology BT: life sciences RT: health and disease plant and animal testing therapeutic methods DF: Scientific study of the nature of disease and its causes, processes, development, and consequences.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 356 pedology (soils) USE: soil sciences TNR: 1183 personnel (USGS) USE: USGS personnel TNR: 1184 pesticide and herbicide contamination UF: biocide contaminants herbicide contaminants BT: anthropogenic contamination RT: biochemistry ecology ecotoxicology DF: Biological disturbances caused by the release of biological, physical, or chemical agents used to kill plants or animals into the environment.
[Adapted from Concise Columbia Electronic Encyc., 1999] TNR: 222 petrography UF: thin section analysis BT: laboratory methods RT: optical microscopy petrology rocks and deposits DF: Use of optical microscopy for the description and classification of rocks.
TNR: 1165 petroleum resources (gas) USE: natural gas resources TNR: 1104 petroleum resources (oil) USE: oil resources TNR: 1160 petrology BT: geology RT: diagenesis igneous rocks
131
metamorphic rocks petrography rocks and deposits sedimentary rocks DF: Study of the origin, occurrence, structure, and history of rocks, esp. igneous and metamorphic rocks.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 889 pH (water) USE: water pH TNR: 1187 phosphorus content USE: nutrient content (water) TNR: 1137 photo galleries (USGS) USE: USGS exhibits and facility tours TNR: 1189 photogrammetry USE: remote sensing TNR: 1190 photographs US+: images photography TNR: 968 photography UF: video methods UF+: photographs BT: methods NT: aerial photography underwater photography RT: videography DF: Art or process of producing images on a sensitized surface (as a film) by the action of radiant energy and especially light.
[MerriamWebster's Collegiate Dic. 
<
[Merriam-Webster Online Collegiate Dic.
132
TNR:
178
phylogeny USE: paleontology TNR: 1176 physical formats UF: format NT: digital format non-digital format SN: The 'physical formats' facet provides general terms for the physical formats of information objects.
These include digital formats and non-digital formats.
More specific formats, such as GIF and HTML, are not included in this thesaurus; it is assumed that specific formats will be documented in metadata by using MIME types and other detailed format descriptions.
To describe the intellectual intent of the items, use terms from the 'object types' facet.
TNR: 581 physical models BT: models TNR: 1099 physical oceanography USE: ocean sciences TNR: 1157 physiology USE: anatomy and physiology TNR: 195 pictures USE: images TNR: 969 place names USE: geographic names and classifications TNR: 27 placenames USE: geographic names and classifications TNR: 854 plains ecosystems USE: grassland ecosystems TNR: 916 planetary bodies BT: topics NT: meteorites RT: planetary sciences SN: Use for extraterrestrial bodies.
TNR: 1085
133
planetary sciences UF: planetology BT: sciences RT: meteorology planetary bodies scientific careers DF: The study of the condensed matter of the solar system, including planets, satellites, asteroids, meteorites, and interplanetary material.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 594 planetology USE: planetary sciences TNR: 1192 plankton UF+: planktonic ecosystems BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: aquatic biology calcareous nannoplankton microbiology phycology DF: Collection of small or microscopic organisms, including algae and protozoans, that float or drift in great numbers in fresh or salt water, especially at or near the surface, and serve as food for fish and other larger organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 402 planktonic ecosystems US+: aquatic ecosystems plankton TNR: 233 planning reports USE: documents TNR: 610 plant and animal tagging UF: animal tagging banding bird banding radioisotope tagging tagging BT: field sampling RT: life sciences DF: Method of attaching a tag to an organism as long-term identification for study purposes.
Tags are made of metal or other durable material on which is stamped an identification number that corresponds to a record about that individual.
Often a mailing address is included, to which the tag may be returned by a finder.
TNR: 292 plant and animal testing UF: animal testing
134
BT: RT: TNR:
laboratory methods anatomy and physiology ecotoxicology pathology 1006
plant distribution USE: biogeography TNR: 329 plants (organisms) BT: organisms NT: nonvascular plants vascular plants RT: botany palynology vegetation DF: Members of the vegetable group (plant kingdom) of living organisms.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1130 plate tectonics USE: tectonic processes TNR: 1193 plot sampling BT: field sampling RT: ecology transect sampling trenching DF: Measuring small areas of land as subsets of a population that, if properly selected, may be used to estimate the parameters of the population.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] 
135
DF: Transfer of pollen from a flower's anther to a stigma, either of the same flower (self-pollination) or of a different flower of the same species (cross-pollination).
Cross-pollination involves the action of a pollinating agent to effect transfer of the pollen.
[Dic. of Biology, Oxford University Press, 2000] TNR: 1327 pollinators BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: ecology entomology ornithology pollination zoology DF: Organisms which aid in the growth and distribution of plants by transferring pollen as a byproduct of their feeding activities.
TNR: 1169 pollutants USE: anthropogenic contamination TNR: 220 pollution UF+: air pollution soil pollution water pollution BT: human impacts NT: anthropogenic contamination RT: ecology ecotoxicology eutrophication hazards natural contaminants social sciences waste treatment and disposal DF: Contamination of the environment as a result of human activities through the addition of substances or energy (e.g., heat) at a rate faster than it can be accommodated by dispersion, breakdown, recycling, or storage in some harmless form.
[Adapted from Encyclopedia Britannica, 2001] TNR: 224 polymerase chain reaction BT: chemical analysis RT: biochemistry genetics DF: Technique used to replicate a fragment of DNA so as to produce many copies of a particular DNA sequence for analysis.
[Adapted from Dic. of Biology, Oxford Univ.
Press, 2000] TNR: 1332 pond ecosystems USE: freshwater ecosystems TNR: 827
136
population and community ecology UF: population energetics BT: topics NT: animal behavior biodiversity biogeography community ecology ecosystems habitats population dynamics RT: biological population management ecological processes ecology ecosystem monitoring natural resource management relative abundance analysis DF: Interactions of a single species (population) or an association of different species (community) occupying a particular region with their biotic and abiotic environments.
TNR: 316 population dynamics BT: population and community ecology RT: algal blooms biogeography ecology DF: Aggregation of processes that determine the size and composition of any population.
[McGraw Hill Dic. of Scientific and Technical Terms, 5th ed.] TNR: 184 population energetics USE: population and community ecology TNR: 1197 posters BT: object types RT: educational materials TNR: 703 power generation water use UF: hydroelectric power generation water use thermoelectric power generation water use BT: instream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology renewable energy resources DF: Water that passes through a power plant for electric power generation.
[Adapted from USGS 
137
precipitation (atmospheric) UF: rain rainfall snow snowfall UF+: precipitation measurements rainfall measurements snowfall measurements BT: atmospheric and climatic processes RT: atmospheric deposition (chemical 
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 266 precipitation measurements US+: field inventory and monitoring precipitation (atmospheric) TNR: 767 predators USE: carnivores TNR: 413 press relations (USGS) USE: USGS media relations TNR: 38 press releases USE: news releases TNR: 1119 price lists (USGS) USE: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 1204 pricing and ordering (USGS) USE: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 1205 proceedings USE: documents TNR: 611 producers (organisms) BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: botany ecology microbiology
138
DF: Organisms that can form new organic matter from inorganic matter such as carbon dioxide, water, and soluble salts (e.g., most plants).
[Adapted from the Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1170 product support (USGS) USE: USGS product support TNR: 1206 programs (USGS) USE: USGS programs TNR: 1208 projected time period UF: future time period BT: time periods SN: This term should be used to indicate that the item has a projected (future) time period associated with it, where that is a significant factor about the item.
DF: A date that is beyond the present at the time that the projections are being made.
TNR: 833 prospecting USE: natural resource exploration TNR: 1106 protists UF: foraminifera protozoans radiolaria BT: organisms RT: algae microbiology micropaleontology DF: Any of the eukaryotic, unicellular organisms of the former kingdom Protista, which includes protozoans, slime molds, and certain algae.
The protists now belong to the kingdom Protoctista, a new classification in most modern taxonomic systems.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 813 protozoans USE: protists TNR: 1210 public water supply USE: domestic water use TNR: 626 publication servers (USGS) USE: USGS publication servers TNR: 1212
139
published series USE: documents TNR: 612 quadrangle maps US+: maps and atlases topography TNR: 1060 quadrangle names BT: terminologies and classifications RT: maps and atlases topography TNR: 1214 quarrying USE: mining and quarrying TNR: 1097 radar imaging BT: remote sensing NT: SLAR RT: geography microwave imaging DF: An imaging method for detecting distant objects and determining their position, velocity, or other characteristics by analysis of very high frequency radio waves reflected from their surfaces.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1215 radio telemetry USE: telemetry TNR: 1217 radioactive waste repositories USE: waste treatment and disposal TNR: 1218 radioisotope tagging USE: plant and animal tagging TNR: 1219 radiolaria USE: protists TNR: 1211 radiometric age determination USE: radiometric dating TNR: 1220 radiometric dating UF: age dating (radiometric) radiometric age determination BT: isotopic analysis
140
carbon-14 analysis rubidium-strontium age analysis uranium-lead analysis uranium-thorium analysis RT: fission-track dating geochronology DF: Methods of age determination based on nuclear decay of naturally occurring radioactive isotopes.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 156 radon BT: toxic radionuclides (natural) RT: ecotoxicology DF: A colorless, radioactive, inert gaseous element formed by the radioactive decay of radium; health problems result from breathing air contaminated with radon gas.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1224 rain USE: TNR: precipitation (atmospheric) 1200
NT:
rainfall USE: precipitation (atmospheric) TNR: 1201 rainfall measurements US+: field inventory and monitoring precipitation (atmospheric) TNR: 768 rangeland ecosystems USE: terrestrial ecosystems TNR: 105 Rb-Sr age analysis USE: rubidium-strontium age analysis TNR: 1225 re-establishment (organisms) USE: reintroduction (organisms) TNR: 112 reaches (hydraulic) USE: river reaches TNR: 1226 reaches (streams) USE: river reaches TNR: 1228 real-time period BT: time periods
141
SN: This term is to be used for datasets that are available on a realtime basis; that is, data from current observations and measurements.
DF: Time period designation for data that is available immediately after collection or generation, allowing influence on further processing of data.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1229 reclamation USE: remediation TNR: 1230 recolonization (organisms) USE: reintroduction (organisms) TNR: 111 reconnaissance USE: field inventory and monitoring TNR: 769 recreational fishery resources UF: recreational fishing sport fishing BT: fishery resources RT: aquatic biology ichthyology marine biology DF: The stock of fish and other seafood resources in areas used for recreational fishing.
TNR: 796 recreational fishing USE: recreational fishery resources TNR: 89 red tides USE: algal blooms TNR: 181 reef ecosystems UF: coral reef ecosystems BT: marine ecosystems RT: coelenterates ecology marine biology marine fishery resources DF: Ecosystems in ridges of rocks or ridges built by sedentary calcareous organisms, esp. corals, that stand above the surrounding deposited sediment and rise to or near the surface of a body of water.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1198 reef fisheries USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 82
142
reef fishing USE: marine fishery resources TNR: 1069 regression analysis UF: correlation BT: statistical analysis DF: Mathematical method of modeling the relationships among three or more variables.
It is used to predict the value of one variable given the values of the others, represented as an equation that expresses the relationship.
[Adapted from Computer Desktop Encyc., 2001] TNR: 533 regulations USE: policies and regulations TNR: 103 regulations (USGS) USE: USGS policies and regulations TNR: 1232 reintroduction (organisms) UF: re-establishment (organisms) recolonization (organisms) BT: biological population management DF: Human-facilitated return of organisms to environments previously occupied by those organisms.
TNR: 110 relative abundance analysis BT: computational methods RT: ecosystem monitoring population and community ecology DF: Calculation of the relative abundances of individuals of one group (e.g., taxon) in comparison with the total number of individuals in all comparable groups in a certain area or volume.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 491 relief maps US+: maps and atlases topography TNR: 1061 remediation UF: reclamation restoration BT: natural resource management NT: bioremediation RT: ecology ecosystem monitoring engineering geology
143
DF: Methods for decontaminating, reclaiming, and restoring natural resources.
TNR: 360 remote sensing UF: airborne imaging photogrammetry satellite imaging space-borne sensing UF+: remote-sensing data remote-sensing images satellite altimetry BT: methods NT: aeromagnetic surveying aeroradiometric surveying hyperspectral imaging IFSAR infrared imaging LIDAR microwave imaging multispectral imaging panchromatic imaging radar imaging thermal imaging visible light imaging RT: aerial photography geography seismic methods telemetry videography SN: Remote sensing is used in this thesaurus to refer to methods that are solely or primarily used through airborne and space-borne deployment.
Related methods (e.g., photography) that are used frequently on the ground, underwater, and from airplanes and satellites are not included as narrow terms of 'remote sensing'.
TNR: 148 remote video monitoring USE: video monitoring TNR: 1238 remote-sensing data US+: images remote sensing TNR: 970 remote-sensing images US+: images remote sensing TNR: 971 renewable energy resources UF: energy sources (renewable) BT: renewable resources
144
geothermal resources hydrogeology life sciences power generation water use volcanology DF: Sources of energy that are used for heat and power generation that are constantly replaced, including solar, wind, water, and geothermal energy sources and conversion of biomass (material, vegetation, and agricultural waste) to fuel.
TNR: 718 renewable resources BT: natural resources NT: fishery resources forest resources renewable energy resources RT: life sciences DF: Natural resources with economic value, such as wood or solar energy, that are theoretically inexhaustible because they can or will be replenished naturally in a relatively short period of time.
[Adapted from Dic. of Cultural Literacy, 2nd ed.] TNR: 720 reports USE: documents TNR: 613 reptiles BT: vertebrates NT: dinosaurs RT: herpetology DF: Any of various cold-blooded, usually egg-laying vertebrates of the class Reptilia, such as snakes, lizards, crocodiles, turtles, or dinosaurs, having an external covering of scales or horny plates and breathing by means of lungs.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 590 residential water use USE: domestic water use TNR: 627 resistivity sounding USE: electrical resistivity logging TNR: 707 resource conservation USE: natural resource management TNR: 1109 resource extraction USE: natural resource extraction TNR: 1108 resource restoration
NT: RT:
145
USE: TNR:
natural resource management 1110
restoration USE: remediation TNR: 1233 revegetation USE: bioremediation TNR: 359 riparian ecosystems USE: wetland ecosystems TNR: 1239 risk assessment BT: management methods NT: earthquake probabilities landslide susceptibility assessment DF: The identification of risk, the measurement of risk, and the process of prioritizing risks.
TNR: 1050 river discharge UF+: river discharge monitoring BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: hydrology river systems surface water (non-marine) TNR: 1240 river discharge monitoring US+: field inventory and monitoring river discharge TNR: 770 river ecosystems US+: freshwater ecosystems river systems TNR: 828 river reaches UF: reaches (hydraulic) reaches (streams) BT: river systems RT: hydrology DF: a) Straight, continuous, or extended part of a river (stream), viewed without interruption (as between two bends) or chosen between two specified points.
b) Length of a channel, uniform with respect to discharge, depth, area, and slope.
c) Length of a channel for which a single gage affords a satisfactory measure of the stage and discharge.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1227
146
river systems UF+: river ecosystems BT: surface water (non-marine) NT: river reaches RT: hydrology river discharge DF: Rivers and all their tributaries.
TNR: 1241 rock composition USE: rocks and deposits TNR: 1243 rock mechanics maps US+: engineering geology maps and atlases TNR: 725
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
rocks and deposits UF: lithology rock composition UF+: lithologic maps BT: Earth characteristics NT: fossils igneous rocks metamorphic rocks sedimentary rocks unconsolidated deposits RT: building stone resources lithosphere petrography petrology SN: Use for major rock types and unconsolidated deposits.
For deposits of economic value, see related terms.
TNR: 638 roundworms UF: nematodes BT: worms RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any of several worms of the phylum Nematoda, having unsegmented, cylindrical bodies, often narrowing at each end, and including parasitic forms such as the hookworm and pinworm.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1112 rubidium-strontium age analysis UF: Rb-Sr age analysis BT: radiometric dating RT: geochronology DF: Determining of the age of a mineral or rock in years based on the ration of radiogenic strontium-87 to rubidium-87 and the known radioactive decay rate of rubidium-87.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1221
147
safety issues (human) USE: human environmental safety TNR: 952 sales services (USGS) USE: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 1244 salinity UF: chloride concentration BT: water properties RT: hydrology ocean salinity water chemistry DF: Concentration of naturally occurring soluble salts, such as common salt, sodium carbonate, sodium nitrate, potassium salts, and borax in water, soils, etc.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1154 sand deposits BT: unconsolidated deposits RT: economic geology nonmetallic resources sedimentology DF: Depositions of a) detrital rock fragments or mineral particles smaller than a granule and larger than a coarse silt grain or b) loose aggregate of unlithified mineral or rock particles of sand size.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1131 satellite altimetry US+: altimetry measurement remote sensing TNR: 189 satellite imaging USE: remote sensing TNR: 1234 scanning electron microscopy BT: electron microscopy DF: Use of an electron microscope in which a finely focused beam of electrons is electrically or magnetically moved across the specimen, again and again, and the reflected and emitted electron intensity is measured and displayed, sequentially building up an image with great depth of field.
Useful for the examination of opaque objects.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 710 Scanning Multichannel Microwave Radiometer (SMMR) USE: SMMR TNR: 1245
148
school programs (USGS) USE: USGS K-12 programs TNR: 36 science centers (USGS) USE: USGS science centers TNR: 1246 science programs (USGS) USE: USGS science programs TNR: 1248 sciences NT: Earth sciences engineering sciences information sciences life sciences planetary sciences social sciences SN: The sciences facet represents major educational fields, fields of study, and professional expertise groupings within the USGS.
Science terminology is used to categorize information by its fields of study.
Index also by appropriate topic terms and terms from other facets.
TNR: 347 scientific careers UF: careers in science UF+: scientists-at-work photographs BT: topics RT: Earth sciences engineering sciences information sciences life sciences planetary sciences social sciences TNR: 411 scientific instruments USE: instrument design and development TNR: 984 scientists-at-work photographs US+: images scientific careers TNR: 972 scrubland ecosystems USE: shrubland ecosystems TNR: 1250 sea anemones USE: coelenterates TNR: 472
149
sea floor characteristics UF: seafloor characteristics BT: ocean characteristics RT: bathymetry land surface characteristics marine geology ocean sciences oceanic lithosphere SN: Includes both large-scale structures as seamounts and rises and finescale variation in seafloor rocks and deposits.
DF: Geomorphic features and geographic compositional and textural variation of the materials composing the ocean floor.
TNR: 300 sea floor topography USE: bathymetry TNR: 297 sea surface temperature UF: temperature (sea surface) BT: ocean temperature RT: AVHRR SN: Includes temperature data obtained in situ or by remote sensing methods.
DF: Observed temperature of surface ocean waters, typically encompassing the entire mixed layer but some observational methods may measure a much smaller depth range.
TNR: 288 sea-level change BT: ocean characteristics RT: climatology global change ocean sciences SN: Includes both global (eustatic) sea-level and local (relative) sealevel variations.
DF: Variation in the relative vertical position of land and ocean waters caused globally by changes in the distribution of ice masses and the shape of the oceans, and locally by the rate of uplift or subsidence of the land surface.
TNR: 901 seafloor characteristics USE: sea floor characteristics TNR: 1325 search services (USGS) USE: USGS search services TNR: 1254 seasonal migration USE: migration (organisms) TNR: 1326
150
sections (geologic) USE: stratigraphic sections TNR: 1256 sections (stratigraphic) USE: stratigraphic sections TNR: 1257 sediment transport UF: alluvial transport BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: hydrology sedimentology DF: Phase of sedimentation that includes the movement by natural agents (such as flowing water, ice, wind, or gravity) of sediment or any loose material, either as solid particles or in solution, from one place to another on or near the Earth's surface.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 872 sedimentary rocks BT: rocks and deposits NT: bedforms RT: petrology sedimentation sedimentology DF: Rocks resulting from the consolidation of loose sediment that has accumulated in layers.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 303 sedimentation UF: alluvial sedimentation deposition (sediment) BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: sedimentary rocks sedimentology DF: Process of deposition of sediment; strictly, the act or process of depositing sediment by mechanical means from a state of suspension in air or water.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 565 sedimentology BT: geology RT: bedforms building stone resources clay deposits diagenesis erosion grain-size analysis gravel deposits sand deposits sediment transport sedimentary rocks sedimentation sieve-size analysis
151
trenching DF: Scientific study of sedimentary rocks and the processes by which they were formed; the description, classification, origin and interpretation of sediments.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 890 segmented worms UF: annelids BT: worms RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any wormlike invertebrate belonging to the phylum Annelida, characterized by a segmented body with a distinct head and appendages.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 212 seismic exploration US+: natural resource exploration seismic methods TNR: 1107 seismic hazard maps US+: earthquake occurrences maps and atlases TNR: 664 seismic imaging USE: seismic methods TNR: 1258 seismic methods UF: seismic imaging seismometry UF+: seismic exploration seismic profiles seismograms BT: field inventory and monitoring NT: seismic networking seismic reflection method seismic refraction method RT: remote sensing seismology TNR: 774 seismic networking UF: earthquake monitoring BT: seismic methods RT: seismology DF: Deploying, operating, and maintaining groups and arrays of instruments for detecting and describing local movements of the Earth.
TNR: 673 seismic profiles US+: graphs seismic methods
152
TNR:
912
seismic reflection method UF+: seismic reflection survey maps BT: seismic methods RT: seismology DF: Geophysical technique that produces images of the subsurface by bouncing sound waves off boundaries between different types of rock and deriving depth from the time interval of the returning signals.
Seismic waves are generated from a source such as a vibrating device, explosives, or airguns (in water).
[Adapted from 
Data consists of a series of times versus distances, which are interpreted in terms of the depths to subsurface interfaces and the speeds at which motion travels through the subsurface within each layer.
[Colorado Sch. of Mines, 
153
tectonic processes tiltmeter measurement tsunamis volcanology DF: Study of earthquakes, and of the structure of the Earth, by both natural and artificially generated seismic waves.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 667 seismometry USE: seismic methods TNR: 1259 serial publications USE: documents TNR: 614 sewage disposal USE: waste treatment and disposal TNR: 1262 sexing (plants 
TNR: 782 shaking maps (seismic) US+: earthquake occurrences maps and atlases TNR: 665 shellfish BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: aquatic biology crustaceans invertebrate zoology mollusks DF: Aquatic animals, such as mollusks and crustaceans, that have shells or shell-like exoskeletons.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1171 shorebirds USE: birds TNR: 371 short grass ecosystems USE: grassland ecosystems TNR: 918 shrubland ecosystems UF: scrubland ecosystems
154
BT: terrestrial ecosystems RT: ecology DF: Ecosystems in areas of land that are uncultivated and covered with sparse stunted vegetation.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1251 Side-Looking Airborne Radar (SLAR) USE: SLAR TNR: 1264 side-scan sonar methods BT: sonar methods RT: marine geology marine geophysics DF:
Each transmitted pulse acquires images in a narrow band of the seafloor perpendicular to the ship's track.
Overlapping images are matched to produce a continuous representation of the area.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1263 sieve-size analysis BT: grain-size analysis RT: sedimentology DF: Determination of the particle-size distribution in a soil, sediment, or rock by measuring the percentage of the particles that will pass through standard sieves of various sizes.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 908 simulations USE: models TNR: 90 SLAR UF: Side-Looking Airborne Radar (SLAR) BT: radar imaging RT: geography DF: An airborne radar system in which a long, narrow, stabilized antenna, aligned parallel to the motion of an aircraft or satellite, projects radiation at right angles to the flight path.
It collects extremely fineresolution photography and mapping of the ground surface.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1216 slides (land) USE: landslides TNR: 3 slides (photographic) BT: non-digital format TNR: 1124 slope stability
155
USE: TNR:
landslide susceptibility assessment 1020
slope stability maps US+: landslide susceptibility assessment maps and atlases TNR: 1021 SMMR UF: Scanning Multichannel Microwave Radiometer (SMMR) SMMR images BT: microwave imaging RT: geography DF: Scanning Multichannel Microwave Radiometer (SMMR) is an imaging 5frequency radiometer flown on the Seasat and Nimbus-7 earth satellites launched in 1978.
It measures dual-polarized microwave radiances from the earth's atmosphere and surface, primarily for the purpose of deriving global and nearly all-weather measurements of sea surface temperature, wind speed, and atmospheric liquid water and water vapor.
[
snow and ice cover UF: glaciers ice UF+: ice core sampling BT: Earth characteristics RT: atmospheric and climatic processes glaciation glaciology SSM/I surface water (non-marine) DF: Accumulated snow and glacier ice with special reference to its thickness.
[Adapted from Jackson, 1997] TNR: 639 snowfall USE: precipitation (atmospheric) TNR: 1203 snowfall measurements US+: field inventory and monitoring precipitation (atmospheric) TNR: 1266 social sciences
156
sciences business and economics cadastral and legal land descriptions culture and demographics environmental health (human) hazards health and disease human environmental safety human impacts land use change mining hazards overfishing pollution scientific careers waste treatment and disposal DF: a) Study of human society and of individual relationships in and to society.
b) Scholarly or scientific discipline that deals with such study, generally regarded as including sociology, psychology, anthropology, economics, political science, and history.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 595 socioeconomics USE: culture and demographics TNR: 113 software BT: object types TNR: 1140 soil chemistry BT: geochemistry RT: agriculture and farming soil resources soil sciences DF: Study of the distribution and amounts of chemical elements in the unconsolidated mineral or organic material on the immediate surface of the earth.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 20 soil pollution US+: pollution soil resources TNR: 32 soil resources UF+: soil pollution BT: nonrenewable resources RT: economic geology soil chemistry soil sciences DF: Resources of unconsolidated mineral or organic material on the immediate surface of the Earth that serve as a natural medium for growth of land plants.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
BT: RT:
157
TNR:
1132
soil sciences UF: pedology (soils) BT: Earth sciences RT: soil chemistry soil resources trenching DF: Sciences dealing with soils as a natural resource of the Earth, including soil formation, classification and mapping; physical, chemical, biological and fertility properties of soils per se; and these properties in relation to the use of management of soils.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 655 sonar depth-sounding USE: sonar methods TNR: 1267 sonar methods UF: echo sounding sonar depth-sounding BT: acoustic methods NT: side-scan sonar methods RT: bathymetry measurement DF: Use of transmitted and reflected underwater sound waves to detect and locate submerged objects or measure the distance to the floor of a body of water.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 132 space-borne sensing USE: remote sensing TNR: 1235 spatial BT: NT: RT: analysis computational methods geospatial analysis geography image analysis mathematical modeling topological analysis DF: Analytical techniques to determine the spatial distribution of a variable, the relationship between the spatial distribution of variables, and the association of the variables of an area.
Spatial analysis is often referred to as modeling.
It refers to the analysis of phenomena distributed in space and having physical dimensions (the location of, proximity to, or orientation of objects with respect to one another; relating to an area of a map as in spatial information and spatial analysis; referenced or relating to a specific location on the Earth's surface).
[Computer Desktop Encyc., 2002] TNR: 88 Special Sensor Microwave/Imager (SSM/I) USE: SSM/I TNR: 1268
158
species distribution USE: biogeography TNR: 330 species distribution maps US+: biogeography maps and atlases TNR: 331 species diversity BT: biodiversity DF: The number, types, and distribution of species within an ecosystem.
[Adapted from Oceanus, 
TNR: 407 speeches UF: oral presentations talks testimony BT: object types RT: USGS meetings TNR: 1141 spiders USE: arachnids TNR: 242 sponges BT: invertebrates RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Many-celled aquatic invertebrate belonging to the phylum Porifera and characterized by an internal skeleton composed most frequently of opaline silica and less commonly of calcium carbonate.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 997 sport fishing USE: recreational fishery resources TNR: 1231 spring ecosystems USE: freshwater ecosystems TNR: 829
159
SSM/I UF:
Special Sensor Microwave/Imager (SSM/I) SSM/I images BT: microwave imaging RT: geography snow and ice cover DF: Imaging technique relying on reception of naturally emitted microwave energy emitted from the surface of the earth or atmospheric phenomena.
The microwave region of the electromagnetic spectrum ranges from about 300 MHz to 300 GHz (wavelengths from 1 meter to 1 mm).
[Adapted from 
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 267 stratigraphic sections UF: geologic sections geologic units sections (geologic)
160
sections (stratigraphic) Earth characteristics bedrock geologic units geologic contacts surficial geologic units RT: geologic structure stratigraphy DF: Sequence of rock units found in a given region either at the surface (such as a sea cliff, stream bank, or road cut) or below it (as in a drilled well or mine shaft; a local geologic column.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 305 BT: NT: stratigraphy BT: geology RT: bedrock geologic units biostratigraphy borehole logging electrical resistivity logging gamma-ray logging geochronology geologic contacts geologic history lithostratigraphy stratigraphic sections surficial geologic units unconformities DF: a) Science of rock strata, concerned not only with the original succession and age relations of rock strata but also with their form, distribution, lithologic composition, fossil content, geophysical and geochemical properties.
b) Science dealing with all rock bodies forming the Earth's crust.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 364 stream current USE: streamflow TNR: 1278 stream current monitoring USE: streamflow monitoring TNR: 1279 stream ecosystems USE: freshwater ecosystems TNR: 830 stream flow USE: streamflow TNR: 1280 stream flow monitoring USE: streamflow monitoring TNR: 1281
161
stream gage monitoring USE: streamflow monitoring TNR: 1282 stream-flow monitoring USE: streamflow monitoring TNR: 1283 stream-gage monitoring USE: streamflow monitoring TNR: 1284 streamflow UF: stream current stream flow UF+: streamflow data streamflow modeling BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: hydrology streamflow monitoring surface water (non-marine) water circulation watershed management DF: Movement of surface runoff traveling in a stream whether or not it is affected by diversion or regulation.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 447 streamflow data US+: datasets streamflow TNR: 1242 streamflow modeling US+: mathematical modeling streamflow TNR: 45 streamflow monitoring UF: stream current monitoring stream flow monitoring stream gage monitoring stream-flow monitoring stream-gage monitoring BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: hydrology streamflow TNR: 775 structural geology BT: geology RT: Earth structure folding (geologic) foliation (geologic)
162
fracture (geologic) geologic structure lineation (geologic) neotectonic processes structure contours tectonic processes tectonophysics DF: Branch of geology that deals with the form, arrangement, and internal structure of rocks, and especially with the description, representation, and analysis of structures, chiefly on a moderate to small scale.
(The subject is similar to tectonics, but the latter is generally used for the broader regional or historical phases).
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 657 structure contours UF+: depth-to maps thickness maps BT: geologic structure RT: structural geology DF: Two-dimensional portrayals of structural surfaces such as formation boundaries or faults.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 568 subbituminous coal resources USE: coal resources TNR: 462 subject gateways USE: web portals TNR: 1285 subsistence fishery resources BT: fishery resources DF: The stock of fisheries where fish and other seafood resources are caught and are shared and consumed directly by the families and their kin, rather than being bought and sold at the next larger market.
[Adapted from FAO (1998): Guidelines for the routine collection of capture fishery data.
FAO Fish.
Tech.
Pap, 382: 113 p.; 
163
DF: Gradual process of change in the number of individuals of each species in a community and by the establishment of new species which may gradually replace the original inhabitants.
[Adapted from McGraw Hill Dic. of Scientific and Technical Terms, 5th ed.] TNR: 680 surface UF: BT: NT: RT: water (non-marine) freshwater (surface) water resources river systems floods freshwater ecosystems hydrology limnology ocean characteristics ocean processes river discharge snow and ice cover streamflow surface water quality SN: All non-marine waters on the brackish, and salt water.
TNR: 802 surface water quality BT: water quality RT: hydrology limnology surface water (non-marine) water chemistry TNR: 1286 surficial geologic maps US+: maps and atlases surficial geologic units TNR: 1063 surficial geologic units UF+: surficial geologic maps BT: stratigraphic sections RT: stratigraphy DF: Rock units found in a given region at the surface (such as a sea cliff, stream bank, or road cut).
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1276 surveying USE: land surveying TNR: 1287 suspended material (water) BT: water properties RT: hydrology water chemistry
surface of the Earth, including fresh,
164
DF: Material such as clay, silt and sand that is supported and carried by the water and not in contact with the bottom of the water body.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1288 symposia (USGS) USE: USGS symposia TNR: 1289 systematics and taxonomy UF: taxonomy BT: life sciences RT: biologic names and classifications meristics DF: Study and classification of the type and diversity of organisms and their relationships.
(The terms taxonomy and systematics are usually distinguished, the latter having broader connotation, but they may also be used more or less synonymously).
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 357 tagging USE: plant and animal tagging TNR: 6 taiga ecosystems USE: forest ecosystems TNR: 816 talks USE: TNR: speeches 1269
tall grass ecosystems USE: grassland ecosystems TNR: 919 taphonomy USE: paleontology TNR: 1177 taxonomy USE: systematics and taxonomy TNR: 1291 teaching guides USE: educational materials TNR: 701 teaching packets USE: educational materials TNR: 702 technical instructions USE: manuals
165
TNR:
1051
technical reports USE: documents TNR: 615 technical support (USGS) USE: USGS technical support TNR: 1292 technology transfer (USGS) USE: USGS technology transfer TNR: 1294 tectonic maps US+: maps and atlases tectonic processes TNR: 1064 tectonic processes UF: dynamic geology plate tectonics tectonics UF+: paleotectonic maps tectonic maps BT: geologic and hydrologic processes NT: neotectonic processes RT: Earth structure earthquakes folding (geologic) foliation (geologic) fracture (geologic) lineation (geologic) seismology structural geology tectonophysics volcanic activity DF: Series of actions and changes relating to, causing, or resulting from structural deformation of the earth's crust.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 634 tectonics USE: tectonic processes TNR: 1296 tectonophysics BT: geophysics RT: asthenosphere continental lithosphere crust (Earth) Earth history Earth structure earthquakes
166
lithosphere neotectonic processes oceanic lithosphere structural geology tectonic processes volcanology DF: Branch of geophysics that deals with the forces responsible for movements in, and deformation of, the Earth's crust.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 658 telemetry UF: biotelemetry radio telemetry BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: animal tracking remote sensing DF: Transmitting data captured by instrumentation and measuring devices to a remote station where it is recorded and analyzed.
For example, data from a weather satellite is telemetered to earth.
[Computer Desktop Encyc., 2001] TNR: 368 temperature (air) USE: air temperature TNR: 168 temperature (ocean) USE: ocean temperature TNR: 1155 temperature (sea surface) USE: sea surface temperature TNR: 1253 temperature (water) USE: water temperature TNR: 1297 temperature analysis (Curie) USE: Curie temperature analysis TNR: 545 terminologies and classifications UF: classification schemes terminology schemes BT: object types NT: biologic names and classifications controlled vocabularies geographic names and classifications geologic names and classifications glossaries hydrologic unit codes land use classifications quadrangle names
167
TNR:
449
terminology schemes USE: terminologies and classifications TNR: 34 terrestrial ecosystems UF: rangeland ecosystems BT: ecosystems NT: coastal ecosystems desert ecosystems forest ecosystems grassland ecosystems shrubland ecosystems tundra ecosystems RT: ecology wetland ecosystems DF: Ecological communities together with their environments, functioning as units, living or growing on land.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 468 testimony USE: speeches TNR: 1270 text documents USE: documents TNR: 616 thematic mapper USE: multispectral imaging TNR: 1100 therapeutic methods BT: laboratory methods RT: anatomy and physiology ecotoxicology pathology DF: Methods of restoring health with remedial agents or treatments.
TNR: 1007 thermal imaging BT: remote sensing RT: geography DF: Remote sensing methods studying chemical and/or physical changes in materials as a function of temperature, i.e. the heat evolved or absorbed during such changes.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1236 thermoelectric power generation water use USE: power generation water use TNR: 1199
168
thesauri USE: controlled vocabularies TNR: 518 theses USE: TNR: documents 617
thickness maps US+: maps and atlases structure contours TNR: 1065 thin section analysis USE: petrography TNR: 1186 tidal waves USE: tsunamis TNR: 1300 tides BT: RT: ocean processes ocean circulation ocean currents ocean sciences DF: Rhythmic, alternate rise and fall of the surface (or water level) of the ocean and of bodies of water connected with the ocean, such as estuaries and gulfs, occurring twice a day over most of the Earth and resulting from the gravitational attraction of the Moon and, to a lesser degree the Sun, acting unequally of different parts of the rotating Earth.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1148 tiltmeter measurement BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: seismology volcanology DF: Measuring slight changes in the tilt of the Earth's surface, usually in relation to a liquid-level surface or to the rest position of a pendulum.
Used in volcanology and in earthquake seismology.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 776 time periods NT: geologic time period historic time period projected time period real-time period SN: The time period terms are to be used to indicate the general time period covered by the item, where that is a significant factor about the item.
TNR: 883
169
time series analysis BT: statistical analysis RT: time series datasets DF: Statistical analysis of a series of data collected at regular intervals of time, producing a frequency distribution in which the independent variable is time.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1274 time series datasets BT: datasets RT: time series analysis TNR: 560 tool development USE: instrument design and development TNR: 51 topics NT: agriculture and farming biological and physical processes culture and demographics Earth characteristics global change hazards health and disease human impacts information system design and development instrument design and development land use and land cover map coordinate systems natural contaminants natural resource exploration natural resource extraction natural resources organism groupings (non-taxonomic) organism growth and development organisms planetary bodies population and community ecology scientific careers water properties water quality water supply and demand SN: The topics facet represents the themes/subjects/ topics of the information objects that are not otherwise represented by the terms in the sciences and methods facets.
TNR: 401 topographic maps US+: maps and atlases topography TNR: 1066 topography
170
quadrangle maps relief maps topographic maps BT: Earth characteristics NT: bathymetry RT: geography geomorphology quadrangle names DF: a) General configuration of a land surface or any part of the Earth's surface, including its relief and the position of its natural and man-made features.
b) Natural or physical surface features of a region, considered collectively as to form; the features revealed by the contour lines of a map.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 299 topological analysis BT: computational methods RT: geography geospatial analysis spatial analysis DF: Topological analysis is the mathematical study of properties of objects which are preserved through deformations, twistings, and stretchings.)
Spatial objects like circles and spheres are treated as objects in their own right, and knowledge of objects is independent of how they are "represented" or "embedded" in space.
[Adapted from 
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1275 tours (USGS) USE: USGS exhibits and facility tours TNR: 35 toxic radionuclides (natural) BT: natural contaminants NT: radon RT: ecotoxicology environmental health (human) DF: Harmful presence of a type of atom specified by its atomic number, atomic mass, and energy state, such as carbon 14, that exhibits radioactivity.
[Adapted from American Heritage of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1102 toxic trace elements (natural) BT: natural contaminants
UF+:
171
RT: TNR:
ecotoxicology environmental health (human) 1103
toxicology USE: ecotoxicology TNR: 225 trace fossils USE: ichnofossils TNR: 71 tracking USE: animal tracking TNR: 5 transcripts USE: documents TNR: 618 transect sampling BT: field sampling RT: plot sampling trenching DF: Systematic method of collecting field data by recording observations or collecting specimens along a vector or measured course across the environment.
TNR: 784 trapping (animals) USE: capturing (animals) TNR: 1341 tree ring analysis UF: age dating (tree ring) BT: laboratory methods RT: geochronology DF: Use of the evidence of the recent past revealed in tree rings to study historical trends and to date events in climatology, ecology, geomorphology, hydrology, and anthropology.
[Adapted from 
172
invertebrate paleontology DF: Any of numerous extinct marine arthropods of the class Trilobita, of the Paleozoic Era, having a segmented body divided by grooves into three vertical lobes and found as fossils throughout the world.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 250 tritium analysis BT: light stable isotope analysis RT: biochemistry geochemistry TNR: 1032 trophic level dynamics USE: food web TNR: 810 trophic relationships USE: food web TNR: 811 tsunami preparedness US+: hazard preparedness tsunamis TNR: 55 tsunamis UF: tidal waves UF+: tsunami preparedness BT: ocean waves RT: geologic and hydrologic processes hazards ocean sciences seismology DF: Series of catastrophic ocean waves generated by earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, or landslides beneath the sea.
[Concise Columbia Electronic Encyc., 1999] TNR: 874 tundra ecosystems BT: terrestrial ecosystems RT: ecology DF: Ecosystems of treeless areas between the icecap and the tree line of Arctic regions, characterized by a permanently frozen subsoil that supports low-growing vegetation such as lichens, mosses, and stunted shrubs.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1299 typhoons USE: hurricanes TNR: 953 unconformities BT: geologic contacts
173
RT: stratigraphy DF: Surfaces between successive strata representing a missing interval in the geologic record of time, and produced either by an interruption in deposition or by the erosion of depositionally continuous strata followed by renewed deposition.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1277 unconsolidated deposits UF: alluvium eolian sediments BT: rocks and deposits NT: clay deposits gravel deposits sand deposits TNR: 60 underwater contours USE: bathymetry TNR: 298 underwater photography UF: camera tows BT: photography RT: ocean sciences TNR: 404 uranium-lead analysis BT: radiometric dating RT: geochronology TNR: 1222 uranium-thorium analysis BT: radiometric dating RT: geochronology TNR: 1223 urbanization USE: land use change TNR: 1011 user feedback (USGS) USE: USGS customer support and user feedback TNR: 1301 user guides USE: manuals TNR: 1052 user services (USGS) USE: USGS user services TNR: 1302 USGS NT: USGS budget
174
USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS SN: This programs and TNR: 1304
contracts and grants facilities news organization personnel policies and regulations programs user services facet provides a category structure for representing the policy descriptions of the USGS.
USGS budget UF: budget (USGS) BT: USGS TNR: 388 USGS clearinghouses UF: clearinghouses (USGS) BT: USGS information services RT: catalogs and indexes USGS search services TNR: 428 USGS college programs UF: college programs (USGS) BT: USGS educational services TNR: 475 USGS colloquia UF: colloquia (USGS) BT: USGS meetings TNR: 477 USGS contracts and grants UF: contracts (USGS) grants (USGS) BT: USGS NT: USGS cooperative research 
175
NT: TNR:
USGS product support USGS technical support 549
USGS data downloading UF: data downloading (USGS) BT: USGS information services TNR: 556 USGS divisions BT: USGS organization TNR: 1306 USGS Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) UF: Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) ESICs BT: USGS information services RT: USGS sales and distribution services TNR: 648 USGS educational services UF: educational services (USGS) BT: USGS user services NT: USGS college programs USGS internships USGS K-12 programs USGS lifelong learning programs USGS meetings TNR: 705 USGS employment and volunteer opportunities UF: employment opportunities (USGS) volunteer opportunities (USGS) BT: USGS personnel TNR: 713 USGS exhibits and facility tours UF: exhibits (USGS) facility tours (USGS) photo galleries (USGS) tours (USGS) BT: USGS user services NT: USGS open houses TNR: 744 USGS expertise services UF: Ask-A services (USGS) expertise services (USGS) BT: USGS information services TNR: 253 USGS facilities UF: facilities (USGS) BT: USGS
176
NT:
TNR:
USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS USGS 751
field centers laboratories mapping centers nuclear reactors observatories science centers visitor centers
USGS fax-on-demand services UF: fax-on-demand (USGS) BT: USGS information services TNR: 756 USGS field centers UF: field centers (USGS) BT: USGS facilities TNR: 760 USGS information services UF: accessing USGS data and products information centers (USGS) information services (USGS) BT: USGS user services NT: USGS clearinghouses USGS data downloading USGS Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) USGS expertise services USGS fax-on-demand services USGS libraries and archives USGS map servers USGS media relations USGS publication servers USGS sales and distribution services USGS search services TNR: 123 USGS interagency programs UF: interagency programs (USGS) BT: USGS programs TNR: 988 USGS international programs UF: international programs (USGS) BT: USGS programs TNR: 990 USGS internships UF: internships (USGS) BT: USGS educational services TNR: 992 USGS K-12 programs UF: K-12 programs (USGS)
177
BT: TNR:
school programs (USGS) USGS educational services 1000
USGS laboratories UF: laboratories (USGS) BT: USGS facilities TNR: 1004 USGS libraries and archives UF: archives (USGS) data archives (USGS) libraries (USGS) BT: USGS information services RT: datasets USGS search services TNR: 246 USGS lifelong learning programs UF: community education (USGS) continuing education (USGS) informal education (USGS) life-long learning programs (USGS) lifelong learning programs (USGS) non-formal education (USGS) BT: USGS educational services TNR: 485 USGS map servers UF: interactive map servers (USGS) map servers (USGS) BT: USGS information services RT: USGS mapping centers USGS maps on demand TNR: 986 USGS mapping centers UF: mapping centers (USGS) BT: USGS facilities RT: USGS map servers USGS maps on demand TNR: 1058 USGS maps on UF: maps BT: USGS RT: USGS USGS TNR: 1068 demand on demand (USGS) sales and distribution services map servers mapping centers
USGS media relations UF: media relations (USGS) press relations (USGS) USGS press relations
178
BT: TNR:
USGS information services 1079
USGS meetings UF: meetings (USGS) BT: USGS educational services NT: USGS colloquia USGS symposia USGS workshops RT: speeches TNR: 1081 USGS news UF: new mapping projects (USGS) new projects (USGS) news (USGS) what's new (USGS) BT: USGS TNR: 1115 USGS nuclear reactors UF: nuclear reactors (USGS) BT: USGS facilities TNR: 1134 USGS observatories UF: observatories (USGS) BT: USGS facilities TNR: 1144 USGS offices BT: USGS organization TNR: 1311 USGS open houses UF: open houses (USGS) BT: USGS exhibits and facility tours TNR: 1164 USGS organization BT: USGS NT: USGS divisions USGS offices USGS partnerships USGS regional organization USGS teams TNR: 1305 USGS partnerships UF: business partners (USGS) cooperative research (USGS) cooperators (USGS) partnerships (USGS) BT: USGS organization
179
RT: TNR:
USGS cooperative research 
USGS personnel UF: personnel (USGS) BT: USGS NT: USGS employment and volunteer opportunities TNR: 1185 USGS policies and regulations UF: policies (USGS) regulations (USGS) BT: USGS RT: policies and regulations TNR: 1195 USGS press relations USE: USGS media relations TNR: 37 USGS product support UF: product support (USGS) BT: USGS customer support and user feedback TNR: 1207 USGS programs UF: programs (USGS) BT: USGS NT: USGS interagency programs USGS international programs USGS science programs USGS standards development TNR: 1209 USGS publication servers UF: publication servers (USGS) BT: USGS information services TNR: 1213 USGS regional organization BT: USGS organization TNR: 1312 USGS sales and distribution services UF: distribution services (USGS) map sales (USGS) ordering services (USGS) price lists (USGS) pricing and ordering (USGS) sales services (USGS) BT: USGS information services NT: USGS maps on demand RT: USGS Earth Science Information Centers (ESICs) TNR: 603
180
USGS science centers UF: science centers (USGS) BT: USGS facilities TNR: 1247 USGS science programs UF: science programs (USGS) BT: USGS programs TNR: 1249 USGS search services UF: search services (USGS) BT: USGS information services RT: USGS clearinghouses USGS libraries and archives TNR: 1255 USGS standards development UF: standards development (USGS) BT: USGS programs RT: standards TNR: 1273 USGS symposia UF: symposia (USGS) BT: USGS meetings TNR: 1290 USGS teams BT: USGS organization TNR: 1313 USGS technical support UF: technical support (USGS) BT: USGS customer support and user feedback TNR: 1293 USGS technology transfer UF: technology transfer (USGS) BT: USGS contracts and grants TNR: 1295 USGS user services UF: user services (USGS) BT: USGS NT: USGS customer support and user feedback USGS educational services USGS exhibits and facility tours USGS information services RT: USGS visitor centers SN: The user services facet contains terms to describe types of services provided by the USGS.
For the most part, these are generic terms and not the names of specific services.
181
TNR:
1303
USGS visitor centers UF: visitor centers (USGS) BT: USGS facilities RT: USGS user services TNR: 1308 USGS workshops UF: workshops (USGS) BT: USGS meetings TNR: 1309 vascular plants BT: plants (organisms) NT: ferns and fern allies flowering plants gymnosperms RT: botany DF: Plants with a well-developed conductive system and structural differentiation.
The majority of visible terrestrial plants are vascular.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 758 vegetation BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: botany ecology plants (organisms) DF: Plants of an area or a region.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1172 vertebrate paleontology BT: paleontology RT: dinosaurs vertebrates DF: Branch of paleontology dealing with fossil vertebrates.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 1178 vertebrate zoology BT: zoology NT: herpetology ichthyology mammalogy ornithology RT: game species vertebrates DF: Branch of biology that deals with the fishes, amphibians, reptiles, birds, and mammals, all of which are characterized by a segmented spinal column and a distinct well-differentiated head.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 945
182
vertebrates BT: animals NT: amphibians birds fish mammals reptiles RT: vertebrate paleontology vertebrate zoology DF: Subphylum of the Chordata characterized by an internal skeleton of cartilage or bone, and by specialized organization of the anterior end of the animal; the front of the body is a head that bears organs of sight, smell, taste, and hearing, and the front of the central nervous system is a brain.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 192 vertical datums USE: map coordinate systems TNR: 1054 video disk USE: videodisk TNR: 104 video methods USE: photography video monitoring TNR: 1191 video monitoring UF: remote video monitoring video methods BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: videography TNR: 777 video tape UF: videotape BT: non-digital format TNR: 1125 videodisk UF: video disk BT: digital format TNR: 585 videography BT: methods RT: photography remote sensing video monitoring TNR: 1086
183
videos USE: TNR:
audiovisual materials 284
videotape USE: video tape TNR: 39 virology BT: microbiology RT: environmental health (human) viruses DF: Study of viruses and viral diseases.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 737 viruses BT: organisms RT: virology DF: Simple submicroscopic parasites of plants, animals, and bacteria that often cause disease and that consist essentially of a core of RNA or DNA surrounded by a protein coat.
Unable to replicate without a host cell, viruses are typically not considered living organisms.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1173 visible BT: RT: TNR: light imaging remote sensing geography 1237
visitor centers (USGS) USE: USGS visitor centers TNR: 1314 visualization USE: visualization methods TNR: 1316 visualization methods UF: visualization BT: computational methods TNR: 494 vocalization methods BT: field inventory and monitoring RT: wildlife biology DF: Series of methods used to (a) record sonograms (sound spectrogram) of animal sounds which are analyzed to identify the presence of species in an area and to determine distinct sound patterns within a species, e.g., mating calls, danger alerts; (b) attract species to an area for inventory or monitoring by playing recorded animal sounds or mimicking them.
TNR: 778
184
volcanic activity UF: volcanism UF+: volcano monitoring BT: geologic and hydrologic processes RT: hazards tectonic processes volcanology SN: See Also "volcanoes" as a type of named geographic feature.
Use GeoRef Thesaurus for more specific terms for volcanic activity.
DF: Eruptions during which gases, ash, and lava (molten rock) escape from vents in the Earth's crust.
[
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 891 volunteer opportunities (USGS) USE: USGS employment and volunteer opportunities TNR: 1307 waste repositories USE: waste treatment and disposal TNR: 1317 waste treatment USE: waste treatment and disposal TNR: 73 waste treatment and disposal UF: nuclear waste repositories radioactive waste repositories sewage disposal waste repositories waste treatment BT: human impacts
185
ecology mining hazards pollution social sciences wastewater use DF: Disposal of waste from all human activity, physical, social, industrial and nuclear, in sewage systems, landfills, open dumps and underground, and by recycling.
[Adapted from Concise Columbia Electronic Encyc., 1999] TNR: 950 wastewater USE: wastewater use TNR: 1318 wastewater use UF: gray water grey water wastewater BT: instream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology waste treatment and disposal DF: Water that is reused after release from a wastewater treatment plant.
[Adapted from 
[Adapted from Dic. of Earth Sciences, Oxford University Press, 1999] TNR: 108 water chemistry BT: geochemistry NT: marine chemistry RT: groundwater quality nutrient content (water) oxygen content (water) salinity surface water quality suspended material (water) water hardness water pH water properties water quality
RT:
186
water water DF: Study [Adapted from TNR: 21
sampling temperature of the distribution and amounts of chemical elements in water.
Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.]
water circulation UF: circulation (water) UF+: estuarine circulation estuarine currents BT: geologic and hydrologic processes NT: lake circulation RT: atmospheric circulation hydrology ocean circulation streamflow SN: Use 'ocean circulation' for water circulation in the oceans.
Use this term, 'water circulation' for all other situations that are not specifically covered by the narrower terms.
DF: The flow of water in a large area, usually in a closed pattern or gyre, due to wind over the surface or to varying densities of water, resulting from differences in salinity and water temperature.
[Adapted from Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 270 water demand USE: water supply and demand TNR: 1319 water hardness UF: hardness (water) BT: water properties RT: hydrology water chemistry DF: Property of water causing formation of an insoluble residue when the water is used with soap, and forming a scale in vessels in which water has been allowed to evaporate.
It is primarily due to the presence of ions of calcium and magnesium, but also to ions of other alkali metals, other metals (e.g. iron), and even hydrogen.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 940 water pH UF: pH (water) BT: water properties RT: hydrology water chemistry DF: Measure of the acidity or alkalinity of a solution, numerically equal to 7 for neutral solutions, increasing with increasing alkalinity and decreasing with increasing acidity.
The pH scale commonly in use ranges from 0 to 14.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1188 water pollution US+: pollution
187
TNR:
water resources 1196
water properties BT: topics NT: nutrient content (water) oxygen content (water) salinity suspended material (water) water hardness water pH water temperature RT: hydrology water chemistry water quality TNR: 1138 water properties (marine) USE: marine chemistry TNR: 1150 water quality UF+: water-quality data BT: topics NT: groundwater quality marine water quality surface water quality RT: aquatic biology drinking water use hydrology water chemistry water properties DF: Fitness of water for use, being affected by physical, chemical, and biological factors.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 232 water resource management BT: natural resource management TNR: 1321 water resources UF: hydrosphere UF+: water pollution BT: natural resources NT: groundwater surface water (non-marine) RT: hydrogeology hydrology limnology ocean characteristics DF: General term referring to the occurrence, replenishment, movement, discharge, quantity, quality, and availability of water (non-marine).
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 930
188
water sampling BT: field sampling RT: hydrology water chemistry TNR: 786 water subsurface USE: groundwater TNR: 929 water supply and demand UF: water demand BT: topics NT: water budget water use TNR: 107 water temperature UF: temperature (water) BT: water properties RT: hydrology water chemistry TNR: 1298 water use UF: water utilities BT: water supply and demand NT: instream water use offstream water use RT: hydraulic engineering hydrology TNR: 983 water utilities USE: water use TNR: 1322 water waves USE: ocean waves TNR: 1156 water-quality data US+: datasets water quality TNR: 1320 waterfowl USE: birds TNR: 372 watershed management BT: natural resource management RT: erosion
189
floods streamflow DF: Administration and regulation of the aggregate resources of a drainage basin for the production of water and the control of erosion, streamflow and floods.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 741 weather USE: atmospheric and climatic processes TNR: 258 weather monitoring US+: atmospheric and climatic processes field inventory and monitoring TNR: 259 weather observations US+: atmospheric and climatic processes field inventory and monitoring TNR: 260 web gateways USE: web portals TNR: 1323 web portals UF: subject gateways web gateways website gateways BT: object types TNR: 1142 website gateways USE: web portals TNR: 1324 well drilling BT: natural resource extraction RT: drilling and coring DF: The process of making a circular hole with a drill or other cutting tool, for purposes such as blasting, exploration, prospecting, valuation, or obtaining oil, gas, or water.
[Glossary of Geology, 4th ed.] TNR: 631 wetland ecosystems UF: marsh ecosystems marshland ecosystems riparian ecosystems BT: ecosystems RT: aquatic biology ecology terrestrial ecosystems
190
SN: More detailed terms for 'wetlands' can be selected from the FGDC Wetland Classification 
TNR: 938 wetland functions BT: ecosystem functions RT: ecology hydrology TNR: 689 whaling BT: marine fishery resources RT: marine biology DF: Business or practice of hunting, killing, and processing whales.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 1070 what's new (USGS) USE: USGS news TNR: 1310 wildfires USE: fires TNR: 791 wildlife BT: organism groupings (non-taxonomic) RT: animals wildlife biology DF: Animals living in a natural, undomesticated state.
[Adapted from American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 208 wildlife biology BT: zoology RT: animal tracking game management game species overfishing parasitology vocalization methods wildlife wildlife population management DF: Biology of mammals, birds, and fishes that are neither human nor domesticated.
[Adapted from Merriam-Webster Online Collegiate Dic. 
191
DF: TNR:
Monitoring and control of wildlife as a sustainable natural asset.
334
workshop reports USE: documents TNR: 619 workshops (USGS) USE: USGS workshops TNR: 1315 worms BT: NT: invertebrates flatworms roundworms segmented worms RT: invertebrate zoology DF: Any of various invertebrates, as those of the phyla Annelida, Nematoda, Nemertea, or Platyhelminthes, having a long, flexible, rounded or flattened body, often without obvious appendages.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th] TNR: 801 x-ray diffraction BT: chemical analysis RT: mineralogy TNR: 1340 yearbooks USE: documents TNR: 620 zoology UF: malacology BT: life sciences NT: invertebrate zoology vertebrate zoology wildlife biology RT: animals capturing (animals) carnivores consumers (organisms) herbivores migratory species omnivores pollinators DF: Branch of biology that deals with animals and animal life, including the study of the structure, physiology, development, and classification of animals.
[American Heritage Dic. of the English Language, 4th ed.] TNR: 209
192
